***Written Summary***

At the same time if Roze understands these sciences then he would better understand the totality of his current understanding of his reality shared with others in this world. 
In the past and in the future of all human senses. This is the culmination of known elements and materials being logged into our digital or actual databases. 
Now the object is to make it perfectly humane and habitable. So every piece of scientific modification, tracking, methods is with us for teams to incorporate. 
Medical, forensic science, psychology, chemical, biological, photobiological, biochemical, physics, physiological, sonar, thermal, radar, echo sounds, finders, 
navigation, synthetic aperture, acoustics, reflection seismology and nanotechnologies. To get a better picture of what kind of power we have as a human race 
to monitor potential life outcomes of the entire human population as a whole as it deals with the murderer on a daily basis and we are forced to live 
alongside these criminals that can take our lives at any moment. These technologies can find any material of certain previously determined compounds under 
the water and can detect a variety of other elements thousands of meters away in real-time which is actual. Human bodies have distinct solids stored in 
ourselves for the rest of our natural lives that solidify, this is the current medical standpoint. Roze can lead a perfect, personal nutritional livelihood 
and I can proceed to exercise everyday, this is where these ideas first began to take shape in order to monitor my health, 24/7/365. Vibrant Health. I can 
then shape what kind of body I want with my nutrition and fully know my current health day to day to better protect myself from any infliction. Because I had 
to cut sum pleasure meals out and eliminate them completely. Our technology capabilities can be incorporated into any pair of Nike shoes that have digital 
trackers and your Apple Watch can take an ECG, blood oxygen level, heartbeat, blood pressure and weight. What this system can do is find a specific, 'minute 
compound of any certain mineral or chemical or element through any structure and any, 'body of of human knowledge,' that is currently known. Any type of 
chemical form can be found at any given time. I am the man who originally thought of WhatsApp. This is the same idea if there is a digital signal there is a 
way to communicate with other digital devices and receive information. With the power of these listed technologies, sonar and all of its related technologies 
along with all of the human race's amount of mobile technologies, digital antennas. We can together be able to discern what is necessary in order to defeat 
violence, murder and rape. We already have a vast collection of electronic devices at hand, old and new. Once you complete all of a digital machine's logical 
properties. The next step is to draw the natural and final computer scientists' progressions and conclusions. Then the scientist must update the system for a 
new age and dawn. Anything that is electronic can give a system digital information. In the same way all other sources of electronics can be used for and 
known for. Then with all of this available Roze can begin to build a complete map of all our jurisdictions and a criminal's potential actions with any kind 
of weapon. From this standpoint you have an entire digital-micro-scale world that is exactly like Roze's said present one at the same time in real-time which 
is our shared human reality in nature. Roze the scientist, can then locate any chemical substance and then proceed to successfully remove it from the planet 
Earth. Then our protectors who preserve our well being can fortify, with every precaution known to man then identify and prepare then eliminate the future 
human mortal problem. "Hang up every bootstrap." The human race is not meant to live alongside senseless death and violence, the logical conclusion is its 
phenomenological extinction. Now let Roze begin. For it is paramount. Which is a defining law of our computer science which is our logia. Once the object of 
the class is known it is saved, logged and organized into a digital data table. Meaning any whereabouts of all. Would always be known furthering drawing 
conclusions which individuals are prone to commit violent crimes with any form of human weapon that you can think of. As Roze is creating, 'Book Reals' 
with our human knowledge at hand which is imagery derived from my written language. To correctly understand our proximity to these murderers with weapons 
that can kill us at any given time. As persons use technology on a daily basis and 24/7/365. If their is a collection of people off the grid, it is also 
known further bringing to our attention what devices these 'kriminals have in their possession, on their person. Everywhere Roze finds digital technology 
it can then be expressed as nanotechnology. Antennas, personal phones, any form of digital structure forming a cohesive-neural-massive-global-digital net 
then we can have our government agencies correctly monitor our well-beings. As the United States already tracks and monitors us in totality, inside the 
NSA - National Security Agency. What we have here is this, a vast collection of data derived from the human population as it is a biological species, 
taxonimized and ontologically understood by the system. Which in turn you can localize to the governement database, give form to data sets and data groups, 
term and label each into different selected groups of nomenclature further meaning the NSA - National Security Agency can understand all of our whereabouts 
and what we do as citizens and what each American citizen will do in the future. So from this collection of data the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA), 
FBI – Federal Bureau of Investigation, Chicago Police Department have in their possession. They can basically, as I have said, know everything about every 
single person and what our life outcomes will be and any 'kriminal activity. You can then begin to make eliminations of stereotypes, human ideals, 
ideological conclusions that keep us from saving human lives in the fight for life or death. Our chosen leaders must narrow this down and this has been 
deemed a necessity. Furthermore with this collection of technologies the human race, presently has at hand. We can properly discern, 'minutely which 
particles, chemical elements the criminal has or will have. While we have our government agencies monitoring our daily practices, whereabouts, all of our 
human routines. We can effectively determine when murder will happen and to never have it take place, forever.

Now let us with our technologies at hand begin to formulate just how we would identify these types of chemical compounds and elements. What are the weapons 
made of, what are these, 'deadly weapons' composed of, what is the objects scientific properties and what has it in similarity between each of them and what 
is different between each weapon and if the object is a weapon or some other substance, composition or in fact not a weapon. For the system identifies what 
weapon it is which can be used to kill another person at any time. The system must locate by exactly what coordinates this certain weapon is located in our 
world, currently.

With these systems of technologies we have at hand, incorporated in this system on a global scale. The system would then begin to narrow the location down and 
then effectively pinpoint, 'the weapon' to locate to confiscate immediately and without question. This radar system can then display the, 'scientific 
composition data' of this deadly weapon, while saving it in a Microsoft database or a trusted database also chosen by our government agencies, the chosen 
informed protector would then see the definition of this weapon and where the deadly weapon is exactly located on the map which is an entire 
digital-micro-scale-exact-model of our present world that we all live in together as humans in Mother Gaia with the murderers, rapists and thieves. 
This will be displayed digitally across any form of technologies our government agencies have to receive this type of digital information. With this digital 
net created and in definition being viewed with this system as I have previously described we would then together as one, would be able to locate this deadly 
weapon, quite factually, in real-time and eliminate any other forms of human knowledge, which means separating the weapons scientific composition from the 
rest of the scientific determination, then you can label and save this deadly weapon in the chosen database in order to locate it- straight away. This system 
would display exactly where to go and confiscate this weapon from the criminal meaning our chosen protectors would be able to remove this weapon from its 
location and the victim then would no longer withstand mortal harm.

This computer code translation would be to establish the digital net using various antennas and technologies. Proceeding to select a human to perform a scan 
on its brain because these are where these thoughts come from. The more digital signals that there are, the greater the strength of transmissions and 
receptions. Further meaning all that is known, can be represented with our digital technology and this is very important and urgent. That what is to be 
known and what is to happen in the future and when a criminal will attack a victim committing crime and bodily harm and the victim has no defense and will 
proceed to take the pain and the human suffering that this crime entails and there is no help for this helpless, defenseless victim in our society at this 
time. Once again, with every digital net of communication between every piece of technology that there is and all of the different ways to communicate with 
technology and every technological capability we have at hand we can begin to merge these technological properties and can cause hybrid resolutions in time, 
in terms and in place of what the technological contributions are at hand. The main objective is to determine when and where a human will execute another 
human leaving nothing in doubt nor in the way of our chosen protectors vigilance. With this technology you would actually be able to determine if a human 
body enters a stage of unnatural and predetermined rigor-mortis and the noble rot and the decomposition that the human body is at this time, will be and 
is entering, showcasing. Further determining with this technology where the attackers or the multiple criminal attackers will be and where they will be 
coming from and for this very victim that is displaying the common distress.

Now we are beginning to get to the heart of the matter. The very purpose that is this system that I have laid out and designed for the very best 
technological capabilities. We have here is the representation, the collection of the amount we have gathered, saved in a correct data table and various
other forms of human retrieve, human preservation and human data logging. First you must take the overall. Roze must correctly represent the 
entire world in a digital manner. This cohesive-neural-net of digital signals, forming what can be termed an immersive, grand scale, realtime,
exact model on a micro-scale or a large-scale to be interpreted by our machines, by our computers. Now this system has to build many receptors, 
many data collecters, many data gatherers and many digital centers with these forms of data retrieval. Other than building new systems of technology
that is placed in every dark corner of planet earth with our airplanes and our boats. What do we exactly have at our dispose, now? Every second a phone
is sending a signal to a antenna, paid for and built by a telecommunications company offering cell phone service. This system can effectively 
represent the entire state of Illinois, with all of their personal phones each American citizen has on them and if it is either off or on, it does not
matter in this tune, in this wavelength, in this form of digital communication is what we are after. Think of one phone, it can give this system, a
good-size general overall net of digital awareness of its surrounding and what is in the world, that is the chemical makeup. All Roze and his team would
have to do is program a new software update that would work with American citizen's phone antenna and the "Base," the "Base" representing what the team
has built with our Radar, Sonar, Thermal and all of our related technologies that we have incorporated and every form of technological hybrid that gives
the best encompassing in realtime digital net we can possibly think of and can use in the real world. Everyday this one phone can give us information
about another, body, in its radius and give us digital information of what it exactly has on its pursen. Even this chromebook I am using can recieve ongoing
software updates and give a general censensus of what individuals in the Uptown Branch of the Chicago Public Library have on their pursen and the digital
signal that is a circle could even strech on for a couple blocks and interact with another digital signal. Digital Signals && Antennas, relating the digital
info back to the "Base." Where the base recieves the data, saves the data and displays the data in order to view it by the chosen protector. And by design
this "Base" would monitor the same as the phone would and there would be many bases that we could build across Illinois and the USA as a whole. Even
turning all of the antennas the telecommunication companies, the very large and tall ones that they have into another, "Base." How far ranging of a signal
can that one phone give to this system? The digital solution would be to incorporate, multiply and add the commutative properties that is all of these 
different phone signals into one giant representation, resounding, recursive, recalling, culminative, reproducing, reforming, 
large neural-digital-radar-sonar-thermal(related etc.) Net. So now imagine the amount of phone signals we have at all time and how these signals are 
communicating with the different variety of "Bases." This system would have the ability to monitor anything at any time and at all times. 24/7/365 and by
design would get stronger, more fluent and better active and more clear as time goes on with multiple software updates. Because the signals, transmissions,
receptions, recievers by their very definition are quantitative by design.

The greatest purpose the greatest desperate use that you can achieve with this technology system. Is the ability to divide human organisms down to their 
chemical, biological, even metaphysical manifolds, their human understood totality that it is currently in a human understood representation. This meaning 
what is divided, what is seen and understood can be demonstrated then medically and ontologically logged into our chosen data system. Further meaning can 
the scientist understand how long the human organism has lived for and can it understand how much longer the human organism can live for. Roze can begin to 
decipher what it means to live until a human being's natural causes take hold and we achieve a natural and rather timely death, which is our own. For example
we can gauge how long a fish can live for down to the exact amount of days. We are beginning to determine this same thing as a medical community and how 
long a man can in fact live for as long as he can and until his 70's, 80's and into the 90's is rare but as we have moved throughout history as a human 
organism we are beginning to live longer and Roze believes that is because we no longer have as many threats to our living lives anymore than we did before 
when it was, survival of the fittest. When you begin to take-in a human organism, the patient-what have you, there is two points, A && B. Point A, representing 
where the human organism has lived before and how long it has lived up until this current time, of the data-scientific-specific-example that this unit of 
measurement has been taken. Point B, representing the human organisms natural course and how long we as a medical community and with forensic, well-being, 
insight and precept will continue on and into the future, which is our collective futures at hand. For example, this man only has about 4 to 5 years to live 
and his wife will die soon after he does and both, sadly, of natural causes which is their own right, and they both lived long and full lives as scientifically 
and medically expected. As I have previously said before, our human organism existing does not stop at the hands, feet and skull of the head and which what 
that is naked to the human eye but what is happening in our scientifically understood, scientifically now determined darkness and is the natural order, with 
the nature of light, rays, atoms, dust, once again an organism comes into the path of our other bodies either animate or in-animate and what is this exact response 
to this, order of things, that the human organism must perform in order to live a natural living-life amongst others, us human organisms currently living as 
one and in the present. We can then judge decomposition and rigor mortis and the noble rot with this system, that is only achieved by natural causes the human 
organism follows this path, mind you, or if you take your drug-use very seriously and shorten your natural living life and that is your personal choice or your 
a stunt-man. But to begin to get to the heart of the matter that is at hand. You have, (1) human organism, that has has its manifolds in totality, measured 
and its Point A && Point B has been digitally categorized as, nine and twenty years old and will live naturally until somewhere into his 80's but if he takes 
it serious with, substance abuse, I will shorten it, but I have been sober for over six years now and used to smoke weed everyday for about ten years before 
that, quite simply. Now what this technology system will also realize is this, '(1), will achieve an un-natural form of human decomposition happening in the 
next 4-8 days because of (2)' the reason being is because another human organism, (2), is approaching and exalting justice for example multiple verbal assaults, 
or (1) is representing a greater cause that goes against (2)the public murderer, the rapist and the thieves, or is a perfect example of human prey and has its 
guard down and is lying in wait, (2) is now a well-known-notorious-drug-fueled-crazed-lunatic-murderer that is hell-bent on earning what, (1)'s body, equates 
to in the amount of coin it is worth rather than the love it shall hold for its family. Human organism(1) is also categorized as having a clean record and a 
conceal to carry a firearm and has a rather expensive, hard to comeby, commodity and is proceeding to protect its own and other human organisms that it is 
biologically related to, known as its loving family and their loved ones. The local police department Chicago Police Department, the FBI – Federal Bureau of 
Investigation, the U.S. Marshals, the Cook County Sheriff's Office (Official), United States Secret Service, and the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) would 
then be notified of these disturbances to the well being of this human organism, '(1).' So it would continue to live-on and until a natural form of rigor mortis, 
decomposition, and the noble rot takes place rather than the unnatural, and human decisive topical causes, are 'bout to be exalted upon thee and it, by human 
organism '(2),' the well-known and famous, Murderer and a. For example decomposition looks different in water because it is under the influence of different 
forms of light rather than the ground, the grave we sleep beside in comparison at night.

Now what we have developed over the centuries that we so shall have lived, reincarnated once more because Hinduism is a form of physical mathematics 
and a human science. Roze is in touch with these forms of informations, that is the human spirit being expressed outside of our bodies. In the real 
world in a distinction of what I have termed, as 'escopals.' All you must do to invoke one of these spirits drawn from our human metaphysical consiousness 
is this, think of what you have read in a book and in the outside world you may see some beautiful art filled expression further telling Roze's common 
human understanding and any one can be seen at any time and you can see this and we are in fact communicating with these outside world, Mother Gaia, 
expressions and it is related to the grave as well as the Heavens, the utopia of it all. What we have here in a photobiological manner is a term I like 
to call, vertaaaxes in incorporates the physical world with science. Because we invoked these scientific properties and we must scientifically determine 
what these reactions mean to us the photobiological organism experiencing all sciences known to man in express. What I am getting here at is this. 
We are not only represented by flesh, blood and bone, we are in fact represented in other manners that only scientific tools determining light and our 
complete biological organisms moving around this world. These perimeters do not end at our feed and at our head nor our hands. These personal human radii 
continue on for at least 20-30 feet each way around us in circumcision further determining just how our organisms coexist in this world of ours. So the 
example comes up a fish that is very small but the feelers, the bio-genetic extra colours, whiskers, furs, extra camouflage additives given to the species 
there is more than what meets the eye and it takes on this different scientific concern. More meaning that I am not only a human organism that I can see 
but with this scientific technology system I am building that you can see here we can in fact determine many other things the naked eye cannot possibly 
see and what these machines will see is in fact the totality of the human species, rather singular and amongst other bodies. How each will interact with 
another and what in fact interactions will take place and have even taken place.

Neurologically we can scientifically determine if a pursen wants to kill another Pursen and is approaching and will commit the heavy handed and powerful 
criminal acts leading to death at any time. Hell-bent. If we can judge body temperature with Thermography we can see the inner-workings of the human brain 
and how we Assembla our common human thinking patterns and our collected memories. We can discover which of us apart from the human species that is grouped 
all together as one and separate those humans that we have specifically determined human emotions that lead to criminal actions and have proven criminal 
history of abuse towards others.  Foucault-MRI.

Look at these technology systems that we have around us and which is what we can then derive necessarily from it. What processes do we know going further 
and what kind of system that this is designed to do becomes part of the greater picture at hand and to us digitally. When this is the upmost importance 
this is the guide, this is the route, this is the data process that we need to derive and then simply implement it in this system that Roze has designed. 
With the technology processes of the infrared and thermal. Let us take how it defines weapons and displays them quite so, before us. So us humans can 
view it than determine that it is in fact a weapon on the criminal, that is one way. Let us now derive from the medical equipment of what we have at our 
dispose and let the medical technology experts narrow down for us the exact digital process it takes to read a human mind and the ability to scan our 
emotions, yes the biological, chemical building blocks that make up the human mind and the rest of our bodies even. This technology system would then have 
the purpose, the determination and then proceed to derive the scientific method located in the MRI and even the X-Ray and any and all other related medical 
technologies that we have at our dispose, this will be the second way for us. Leading to a newly developed way and this is an already scientifically 
understood way of identifying human organisms with the inclusion of escopals, vartaxxes and what I have termed as vertebraces, this is two manifolds and 
this is how to scientifically measure an organism in its totality. First we discover how a human organism approaches a natural form of decomposition and 
rigor mortis. How many degrees can we measure this substantial scientific notation. For the next perhaps, 8 solid days a manifold. This scientific process 
would be to determine the light that has been shed from a human organism or the breaking down of our individual scientific properties. What exact scientific 
properties does this human organism take on and what does it lose in comparison to a normal living human species. As you can see the human being is living 
perfectly healthy and expected to live and then die onto natural causes this manifold. If it were to take on any disease these scientific human measurements 
would take on different human understood properties. Now once again, we draw these scientific conclusions of how we could determine an unnatural form of 
death the human will experience because before it was in a natural stasis of longevity without any physical harm from manifold to another manifold. This is 
killed or be killed. This is predatory vs. prey. This is everyone out for themselves. The organism would have and this is a must, be under the attack of 
the predator and it is soon to be closing in. When we take this scientific measurement the human being would be seen in example with an attacker approaching 
and then this human being would enter a different manifold which is a different form of scientific existence with different scientific understood properties. 
For example how a star dies. This predator would then begin to impression, disaster, disrupt the very fields surrounding and that make-up and have made, 
this perfect example of human prey and it would then slowly but surely end its life, in a way of means, in 6-8 days, in a variety of different ways, the 
most brutal grotesque way would be chosen. Now we have precept, this is our third way. In order to determine this we would take from the leading scientific 
teams this process and then of course implement it into this technology system so it can perform it in digital realtime and when it is ever so necessary. 
The next process that we need to derive from our leading technology teams that have expertise in any form of radar and sonar and any other form of our 
related technologies we have at hand. Label and determine the scientific logical processes of how this system relates to us, just how, it finds any chemical 
compound thousands of meters away then saves this DataSet and reports back to us where it exactly is, what it is then we derive then digitally implement 
this into our technology system, this is our fourth way. Then reverberate with every antenna that you see, with every 'Base' that we can build we can then 
implement this into our quantative-recievers-transmissive signals and we resound this repetitively exactly what the human population needs in order to save 
itself from predators with either their hands, heads, elbows and feets and any form of blunt object and any and all kinds of guns, explosives and 
nuclear warheads.

The antennas communicating with the bases and communicating with the other antennas. For this only derives the methods that are already, in use, 
inside working systems and implementing them into a new technology system. The antennas would have the ability to communicate in any way to any 
other form of antenna or base that this technology system, can use to fully control at one time or another and that means at all times as well. 
One way the entire collections of antennas, bases and signals would communicate would to be establishing an entire net of a scientifically 
examined area that is understood by this technology system in totality and if it isn't understood then this system would proceed to understand 
what is there and then perform a data save, a data view would then display the necessary information this system wants to display for the user. 
That would be one way. The other way these antennas, bases and signals would communicate and data log all movements, shapes and sizes and chemical 
compositions in the selected area that these signals of telecommunications are digitally describing and will then next fulfill their technological 
purposes to the database. This net would be proven to be performing 24/7 and at all times. There wouldn't be any down times and if that where to 
be the case, there are significant measures to backup this system from never happening, proving that this technology system will never go dark, 
this system will be impenetrable to any and all cyber attacks and will perform all of its duties until the objectives are made clear and have 
completed themselves until all are completed and then the next step would be to perform this in a repetition until all objectives are fulfilled 
and by design this system gets stronger, more fluent and a backbone to any and all cyber intelligence that we have, take place and have 
implemented for example this system that you can see before you. The software implemented and designed antennas available would have a variety 
of properties that it can fulfill objectives in a necessary way to complete those objectives and, anything that these antennas communicate with, 
can then communicate with these antennas, in any certain way that our collection of scientific teams want to properly scientifically decipher in 
order to fulfill all of our objectives, in order to protect the entire human race from any and all harm to any individual at any given time in 
the current world.

The cosmic tail. IT would happen to know it that every reaction comes from an action, leading to a process process'ized. Furthermore. With every cause 
there is a scientific effect. "There would be good no more." There would be makings. There would then be scientific measurements to research and 
data retrieve. And this is what it is. This: a scientific measurement of a man typing away at his keys. Of a Google, chromebook the time of day is a 
little more deliberate, but as you can see. From about 3:30PM to 5:20PM on the Tuesday of the Month and then the Date in this exact time on this scale, 
so to be and we can translate this into real-time like language, like a shedded cosmic, which is a meta-physical take on it; skin. There he would in fact, 
leave his fingerprints and his exact motions that his skeleton, his bones filled with blood and muscle in order to still keep typing this, once again 
leaving a trace. A scientific trace that I have made since I exited the womb of a whore. There would be no better making then what is this. The totality 
of biological sediment is now the physical memory once again, in totality, of what our naked eye without science cannot see, and if they eye were to it 
would take on a different meta-physical makeup rather than the current spiritual skeleton that we do have as this will take on different faces and facets. 
Now let us have you, said here. The makings, once more. That it is of anything I have done in the past still, in fact, exists and anything I have or will 
do in the future will be measured by the light contained by our human circulatory system and our hands and our feet and head and the rest of the body and 
where I went, where I have operated and gone.

For this project has become quite expansive, understandably:

(1.)First and foremost, identify any human deadly weapon its current location, where it is traveling to end up at and then finally its lawful confiscation 
preventing any form of innocent bloodshed or violence about to be committed by the criminal(s).
(2.)Second, being to develop this technology system we have at hand and with our already understood technological methods we have in place, for this 
system's scientific eye and data retrieve leading to its dataView would be able to determine in a variety of ways, future and potential, criminal violent 
harm of any kind to any, would be victim, which is about to be committed to anyone at any given time in the entire world.
(3.)Third, a new class a new interface what have you would be to even decipher past crimes committed by criminals with scientific research leading to 
forensic analysis and law group determinations of the proof needed to prosecute those who have committed horrific crimes in the past and of which they 
have done so.
(4.)Then from here, this point, any other layer of design, implementation, construction or ability needed by General Mark A. Milley or 
President Joe Biden or any other trusted affiliate named by them. Could be brought to our shared reality and completed. Then that would mean in turn, it 
can also prove anyone's innocence and clear any innocent man, women or child of their name.
(5.) Then our good forces would like this project's codebase to be taken into the lair of RTS, had it been like this then that would mean it would have to 
be devised as an interactive environment in totality and a drone-like destiny 360° camera views traveling from, point [A] to point [B], in designation. 
My senior programming lead has actually told me that this computing power would be not only doable but also not as vast as I am currently thinking, 
meaning from here we could add more and more moonshots to be implemented.

I want you to begin to think of the human body in the sense of how often and how constantly we are around, in the presence and within any form of technology.

*Dissertation and Critique of all Branches of Law Enforcement (including the CIA, the Secret Service, the FBI, our Homeland Security, the NSA and the Chicago Police)*
@CIA, @FBI, @NSAGov, @SecretService, @CCSOPIO, @USMarshalsHQ, @DEAHQ, @US_FDA, @Chicago_Police.

🎖️ This is what you stand for, are known for and represent. The Bagram torture prison, where you use your own kaffiyeh for your own torture. 
The Columbian Prostitution Ring. Guantanamo Bay Detention Camp and you did not obey @BarackObama's command to shut down and tortured them and took pictures. 
Grotesque civilian casualties and mass murders. @wikileaks, Bradley Manning and Edward @Snowden. Your handling the sex slavery ring and Operation AK47, 
gun walking scandal which is Operation Fast and Furious. The Homan Square @CIA black-site where you removed the rights and freedoms of innocent men and 
women and tortured them as well. The war on the drug that is now legal in 27 states recreationally, marijuana and 2 sides, Good Cops vs. Murder Pigs.

🎖️ Believe me when I say this @CIA, as you stand for all branches of human thought and intellect which is our collective law enforcement in 
Chicago and across this world. Everyone believes in hard power to achieve tranquility and solidarity. In that we will achieve 
ultimate freedom.It comes down to ultimate personal freedoms and their acre and what they have on their person and what they are, we are in 
possession of and as long as you don't cause any harm to any innocent victim neither physical nor emotional harm then what you have here is 
this. Vindication.

🎖️ All those with blood on your hands although very law-abiding and very dutiful lawfully present yourselves to all of the good cops fighting the 
murderers with us and remove the power dressing that you have. You need to come to a decision and the decision is this. Exhibit hard power with self 
control and the correct human reason and justification and no longer hunt. No longer get vigilantes to crack under your hoofs. Complete due diligence 
in accordance with the public will and the common good that represents the entire community this issa kill or be killed society realize with us that 
drug prohibitions will no longer exist eventually as two are done with. Once again come to terms the choice has always been "good cops" and the community 
will live, prosper.

🎖️ A reminder. We collectively represent the American people which is a community built on harmless individuals that need these systems to work for us and 
not against us. Do you comply and another I'm going to take my time to recognize that the vast majority is completely defenseless and those with conceal 
to carry guns and weapons you need to label them and get them into a circle. Notice that one side has completely clean records and I mean pristine and 
the other side the murder pigs and by the way the community no longer trusts has to expunge these criminal records so they can walk around with their 
illegal pieces and prey and hunt after us the innocent victims and we are always in a state of constant victimization. Everyone under the law now.

🎖️ When you exalt this hard power which is ours. The American People want you to understand that it is a double-edged sword and no one, 
I repeat, no one is safe from this blade and experience is not an excuse, do you comply? A man in for life for moving a large quantity of 
marijuana now legal in 27 states. Just how can you possibly bend, reshapen and twist words into a new justificaition, @Chicago_Police, 
@FBIChicago, @SecretService, @CIA. The murder pigs have chosen to be intellectually blind.

🎖️ I would like to address the powers that be, @CIA, @SecretService, @FBI, @Chicago_Police as I just went up and down the line. Embody the reason of 
@BarackObama, @POTUS45, @POTUS not any thing else and you take your pick. Once you have all of the gun and weapon carriers in a circle label them 
and just see if they in fact have a conceal to carry a weapon license while separating those with illegal pieces. Continue to work with us, 
the "gangmembercops" as we would be more than willing as always to help you along in this determination. These Presidents can also help you in 
your criminal determination of just who is who and what is what. Who are the, "good cops" and who are the, "murder pigs" that are 
helping, assisting along the gangbangers that terrorize us, hunt us and prey after us. You can no longer use law to your advantage.

🎖️ Then once you have all those with weapons labeled, then continue to monitor, watch, expect there whereabouts and who is on the side of the law with you 
and who is against the law, abiding by the law and using the law to their advantage once you make this forensic determination. Notice us, the People Nation, 
Folk and all of the Cartels have conceal to carry guns and weapons licenses and are assisting you in protection in every which way that crime comes upon us. 
Notice how we will never be trusted and if we do any criminal wrong-doing the "Murder Pigs" will throw us in jails. Understand this, the Mob and the 
Irish Mob and those who-else have long standing histories to this society plagued with crime and there are very many dark spots and openings for murderers 
to operate in and prey.

🎖️ I would like to draw your attention. To what is readily available on a daily basis and since it has taken on this form for the purpose of personal 
euphoria's, altered states and these spirits have always been around us and with us. The reason I say this is because these materials, these recreations, 
these forms of human physical, emotional and sexual pleasures can be found soon to be and instantaneously made available upon quandary at a cost of 
your safety and money usually the most that is at your dispose. As they have been for hundreds of years and will be for a hundred years more. 
The dismissal, the denial and the oppression and prohibitions is a sign of mental, physical and emotional stupidity and your putting human life in 
harms way because so. We must refrain from such matters.

🎖️ The choice has always been and will be for the foreseen future, our collective futures. "Hard Power" and unconditional-Human-Reason-Justice that 
prevents the problem, the crimes, the loss of life from ever happening in the first place. You see how it already kinda is and kneeds to be, unsheathed. 
Let us, the community, the People, this Nation assist you in every which way that we possibly k'an to stop the Murderers from 'murdering,' Us, so 
fluently, briskly and with absolutely nothing in their criminal Wayz.

🎖️ I want us to determine violence upon innocent human life in a better way and it has come down to ideological desperation, @CIA, @SecretService, 
@FBI, @Chicago_Police and due to your helpful informational arm, the @NSAGov we us, the American People have absolutely nothing to hide.
I mean those in the law enforcement system can find anything about us and anything they desire to know about us. It has become very peculiar in 
this way. We need to switch our mortal clocks, we need to come to better personal outcomes in saving any form of human lives before us.
Who do you think knows violence, the best? The clean gangmembers that assist you in assassinating murderers and we must realize, pitting 
humans against each other is one of the most deadly psychological forms of human weapons known to man. The loss of life and protection 
from it.

🎖️ Why the f**k on Earth, doesn't @LeaderMcConnell && @SpeakerPelosi have the backside of heavy-handed-hard power, thought out, all the 
justice in this grand world of Ours. With every dig you feel the shovel. Just like we do out here in the Street. Never coming off, check-a-roo.

🎖️ Where going to translate street justice. Into hard power geo-latrique, political-espionage, judicially-protecting any form of human victim, 
bilateral human protection services. From the most deadly forms of murder and bodily harm there can be and that you can in fact name, @CIA.
See how he isn't doing anything wrong but doing everything wrong, in the first place and do you see how he has completely no open mind to 
the problems that plague society at hand and do you see how his, intellectual thought is the only thing that is right and he only trusts 
Pigs. Is the Quest to know everything at any given time, done and couldn't be more done and over with with the technology capabilities you have at 
hand and the amount of prisonognation you have at your dispose you basically kontrol the worlds human race like a flock. You listen to me.

🎖️ Let me be perfectly clear in the amount of inception. You, the @CIA, @SecretService, @FBI, @NSACyber since then you have gone against the 
chosen Generals, the only Leaders of our Armies with the head of Justification && Prosecution when this is the only reason you exist 
in this? The whole point to your existence is to follow General Milley's command and you only follow his direct word, his instruction 
and his desires. You operate the plane without the wings and the engine, like a drone. Every form of your powers, is his and nobody else. 
His own. Nothing more than operating under the will and the discretion of the chosen General of our Armies. I cannot say this enough. This is 
your only purpose and he knows your future, your past and present. You are his eyes and his ears and his abilities. General Mark A. Milley 
and nobody else.

🎖️ I need you to take a look around, and ascertain what needs to be done. Which one of our solutions is the logical conclusion to the termination of 
senseless death and violence. I need you to sit on a double-edged sword and realize again the vast majority of Americans are defenseless. I have a 
system that can easily be put into place and its the natural progression of our technological capabilities. We have every form of knowledge at our 
dispose and we need to save human life at all costs but not at the extent of our own lives. We as one, make murder and any kind of bodily harm cease 
we have many blind spots and there needs to be more prevention, no longer cleaning up the mess, the systematic violence has many stems as I have 
previously explained to you. We can secure our futures.

🎖️ The @CIA NAND the @SecretService is the most powerful of all the branches of law enforcement and on par with all the other higher power forms of 
law enforcement a'kross this world. The @FBI is a well known operating arm but it can act alone and is taking the lead on the, "Sex Slavery, 
Prostitution and the Drug Ring,"it serves as intelligence for the @Chicago_Police Department as we have heard on our police scanners. That means you have 
a, 'run of the mill,' form of, 'loosey goosey,' with private information serving as a bottlecap to the whereabouts of all that is K'nown. The 
answer is you don't have enough prevention, codes of k'onduct, wherewith-all to stop all senseless violence and death. When you have 
our various solutions at your behest this has now been deemed a pedestrian operation meaning we can better guard ourselves.

🎖️ It is law, cyber law that all of our intelligence is under one house and it should be by definition, @Microsoft. All other company systems 
I have deemed are spy agencies. With the amount of data troves we have on hand. It is impossible not to know the entirety of our human population. 
Everything is shared, common knowledge and ours for the taking.Anything about a human individual or group of people is deemed known and will be Known.
How else? Mourning human patterns, work-daily human patterns, eating patterns, human relationship patterns, amount of digital use human patterns, 
human travel patterns, human purchasing patterns, human interaction patterns, human logistical patterns, human law patterns, human performance.

🎖️ I'm going to touch base. Why does the community walk around in fear and where are you spending most of your manpower? In which and what way? I am asking 
you why does the like of us walk in constant terror of being pinned, pinched and bit? Why do the murderers, rapists and those who partake walk, live and 
exist in a world completely free of this fear that we all share in accordance with your demonstrative, hard power, psychological techniques? Please list 
all of them you have at your dispose. What are you imploring to us. The Prohibition of Marijuana is over with just like Alcohol. Senseless death and 
violence means that you have all failed at your jobs. You need more manpower and you need to implement my technology system I have laid out for you. 
Anything can happen, then more precautions.

🎖️ Who do you think knows best the violent criminals, @CIA. Do you still think violence only comes from gangbangers? The solution is prevention, the failure 
was elimination. Our systems that can save us from mortal-grave-harm. Constantly cleaning up the mess, is that detective work? The definition has now 
become any form of mortal harm and personal attack can happen. Then we lay out all of the ways that a person can die from violent crime. Then all of the 
ways a criminal can commit violent crime upon another citizen. Then we come to several conclusions as to just how we proceed from there. You need to 
prosecute a citizen if it harms another under the influence of drugs. No longer waste manpower on prohibiting any drug we need to utilize our manpower and 
our technology the best we can. Saving the best majority of the population we can.

🎖️ I guarantee with all of the Mobs and Gangs and Personal Family Protection that we have working closely, cleanly, alongside all branches of law 
enforcement.@CIA @SecretService @uscoastguard @FBI @NSAGov @Chicago_Police We can secure everyone's safety and the public believes this. The answer 
is that we need to take this upon ourselves. Because we all standby and we watch our family members die right in front of us. The answer you 
provide us is not the solution and it has been tried before, grisly. We need to batten down the hatch and have all hands on deck.

🎖️ I need you to terminate the estimation that is your and has been your responses to the common will of the national public. 
@CIA @SecretService @FBI @DHSgov @NSAGov @Chicago_Police operate under the direct order of General Mark A. Milley no more reasons as to why you are 
operating under anyone else but the 20th Chairman of the Joints Chief of Staff embody the causes, common will and the destiny of the public faith and 
the entire battalion of our serving and armed forces to such a degree that contains world peace, tranquility and solidarity instantaneously
represent the entire human population and save it from certain peril and remove all violence off the map. Complete these objectives, Mark has set out for 
you and only operate in peace. Remove murder from us, the defenseless, immobile, harmless innocent American Body and repeat.

🎖️ I would like to address your day to day. How do you go about it? And do you think it has been successful? Do you think that right wing or left wing is the 
correct way? Do you think that throughout your history you have been successful? I want you to list all of your problems you are plagued with and I want you 
right alongside of them list all of your capable solutions. I want you to successfully come to beneficial conclusions for all. Do you personally decide 
how much of the human race to save from senseless death and violence? How is this dire decision made and are you leaving human beings to fend for themselves. 
What is your current outlook for next year, 2023 and how that will impact the human population. What else would you like to know about the human population?

🎖️ First of all, what do you do? And because so many of us innocent people are dying the answer simply becomes you need more manpower. When you address the 
public its life or death solutions. This means what is a problem that plagues the human race you derive the solute, eliminating the problem. The public all 
agrees with cracking down hard on violent drug users we see them coming, a mile away. Why have you deemed societal control the upmost necessity when it 
is human freedoms that need to be safeguarded. Collectively, together as one nation we can eliminate any form of violence. One side of the community fears 
you the otherside clearly uses you to their advantage and only have to abide by the law. Its under the law. You will be checked for criminal 
wrongdoing, always.

🎖️ I would like to draw a conclusion on many of your subordinates, @CIA perform multiple tests on your employees to see if they have personally chosen to 
be intellectually deaf on various subjects. Do you see how dangerous this can be!? How easy is it to get @CIA clearance?

🎖️ I would like to discuss exactly what violence is, to me, to us and the entire population. Violence to be exalted on a helpless, defenseless, 
immobile innocent victim is simply, a choice. And who makes that choice is it someone acting alone and is it only the murderer and rapist? Or is it 
a party of citizens that sleep beside us and act out a plan and execute the plan when the victim lies down, least expects it and feels safe beside 
the likes of good who do not attack nor shed violence to anyone What we are dealing with here is a variety of needless oppressions and forms 
of action that rely on the k'riminals decision. I live in a world where this choice can be made tomorrow to eliminate any form of 
violence onto another innocent victim as soon as possible and with gusto.

🎖️ Hi good-doers, @CIA @SecretService @FBI @NSAGov @DHSgov @Chicago_Police. I always look to movies, film noirs, the mob. I look to a variety of 
literature. I like to take in our periodicals. For this purpose amongst many other things I have come to know and like to enjoy.  Is this 
a subject or a form of art where I can emotionally resound with and learn from. Is this a subject, where children don't die. Is this on 
the other hand a form of knowledge where kids don't die!! I will repeat myself again and again does this chosen political leader believe in
helpless children not going to die? From the hands and actions of murderers? Is this another form, entity, totality that I can learn from and 
can I resonate a purpose where children don't die due to senseless violence and death. Is this something where children don't die? Is this.

🎖️ **The world of violence as it is, to decipher and find my own best personal survival, to be known**: 
I am going to decipher this to my best ability because when it comes down to it, all law and justification, is thrown out and its a, free-for-all, 
your all alone and noone is going to save you which is, perfect prey, and in a state of vulnerability. When it comes and you cannot believe your life 
has come to this and your assailant is acting completing, inhuman. I got a, butcher knife manslaughter and I was on the ground begging for my life 
for yelling multiple verbal assaults. I got 2 box cutters for sayin' something, for being in someones way, and I got held at switchblade for looking 
at somebody. I have gotten jacked in the face 8 times, for nothin' for lies against my name. The point is this the drear dire outcome is much 
more than nobility. You bring a gun you get a gun you bring a knife you get a knife. Everything else. Can be squashed with fists. This murderous 
gang out here and not the visible, brave, courageous protectors of families that has to deal with this pure utter evil on a daily basis that 
has sided with the business/law oppression filled individuals that have sided with the Pigs. Are already at our neck and throats and if you 
against the system at hand the way our very lives are run because you believe in the end to all prohibitions. I just saw the man who could of 
killed me and I just want it squashed and I'll shut my mouth, never verbal assault again. The point is that these murderers and rapists have 
everything at their dispose if you do something that is so small even however how so petty its a violent criminal retaliation and the chain 
of events can be heavily exaggerated further meaning its life or death now. Thas the line You bring a blunt object you get a blunt object.
Its eye to eye, fist to fist and whoever takes the man down is the better man and you won the fight, fair and square, but I am telling you these 
murderous-squalor-business group-gang activity-law-ers-politooks don't wanna fight. I'm gonna tell @lildurk the VOICE that they use 'petty' to their 
advantage and I'm talkin our murderers and our rapists our krooks our krookeds that see human life for not what love it can hold and share but the 
amount of coin that it is actually worth we sleep beside them, these We do not prey on people. We do not hunt. We do not do someone else, in. We do 
not bring harm on to anyone. We only have the right to conceal to carry a firearm and can self-defend, us and our families for our very lives. 
We do not wish ill-will upon anyone, we only protect. What Roze is describin' is the murderous gangs ouch hear. Who have sided with the murder 
pigs and they speak with them to see if their is any openings. Not only do these murderous gangs pin down vigilant gangmembers with murder pig 
rapsheets for anything petty! These murderous gangs once given the murder pig go-ahead prowl in a public opening on us the defenseless, made 
immobile harmless innocent victims perhaps ones who have sided with the Good in this world, the gangs, cartels and the Mobs. Knowing beforehand 
what exactly to do and where to wait. The reason being is because their is room and an explanation for it which is this. Senseless death and 
violence is an everyday thang. Murder can happen rape can happen violent harm can happen in this society. There doesn't need to be any 
explanation for this random chaotic event!
**Societal, Civically, Civilised, Technologically Engineered once again society**.

🎖️ You take on the X-Men banner there issa hill of privilege as you progress no matter how thankless you take on this cause you embody that no more 
children will die to senseless death and violence you operate for no monetary benefit and we will see if the murderers come upon thee.

🎖️ As I repeat this all throughout our time, that is ours, we have one common enemy and its coming from all sides of us and who we are. What makes us.

🎖️ Violence is not sporadic nor a human involuntary movement it doesn't just happen out of nothing. It must and this is important have a cause, a 
backup and a foresight to be exalted on a helpless, immobile, defenseless victim and while we are at ease, resting and idle.

🎖️ We know all steel, we trace all steel where it is, where its going, what its doing probably sumthin' very stupid, very chaotic and very wrong 
so wrong it feels good and nasty ever so nasty I might get sumptin' out of it I might show you how bad it is how bad this feels.
There I was performing what to my best ability is what the murderers and rapists are thinking. @CIA @SecretService @FBI @NSAGov @DHSgov @Chicago_Police. 
So I could best resound the ever so becoming varieties, qualities that in fact make up what, who and are the, 'pursens' that
sleep beside us that pillage us. Removed of all feeling and human emotions because it slows them down. We must come to human survival patterns that
put us, the good the weak, honest, puny good in the best position of protection and human guarding. So we can live in this tomorrow. 
When I think about the Mob, the Havana (cartel) mob, the Irish Mob, every nationality has in fact a mob. The Sinola cartel and the rest of 
the cartels, the familia. The People Nation and the Folk. I only think about families protecting themselves and we owe our safeties to them.
You take on the X-Men banner there issa hill of privilege as you progress no matter how thankless you take on this cause you embody that no 
more children will die to senseless death and violence you operate for no monetary benefit and we will see if the murderers come upon thee.
Violence is not sporadic nor a human involuntary movement it doesn't just happen out of nothing. It must and this is important have a cause, 
a backup and a foresight to be exalted on a helpless, immobile, defenseless victim and while we are at ease, resting, waiting and idle.
Then we must think about the Middle Eastern and the Asian as all ethnicities are correctly represented and they are in fact on all sides of us, 
the good and very high up, well respected, dignified. They each have a Mob. We protect and guard all families from any form of violence.

🎖️ I'm gonna say this once. Have you seen these people? The ones who exist, live walk around in this box with law and justification as the width 
and length to the box? And inside the box, 'pandoras' is this prissy, touchy, I know best, I own everything, I know everyone, implacable
impassable impasse then the other sides of the box there is this your opinion doesn't matter nor is right and at length is my personal 
attention to your well being which isn't mine? Then they move around and pair with other boxes. What I am seeing is perfection and its soundproof
do u think they know sumthin' we don't and do you think they contribute to senseless violence and death even tho they very and visibly cherrie 
and berrie against. Should we no longer look to them nor there for our answers to, u know the end to the problem that we all share.

🎖️ We will tell you, the @Chicago_Police, the @FBI, the @CIA, the @SecretService, the @CCSOPIO, the @USMarshalsHQ everything that you need to 
know. We do not harbor and will never harbor. We do not hold the rose with the thorns. We are only flowers. Leafs in the breeze. Middlemen.

🎖️ For we look to our communities, our neighborhoods and what do we find. Families guarding their loved ones and having conceal to carry a firearm licenses.
Who, just who are those, who have this in common. Who do we collectively see, day in, day out. Is this the Wild West, is this hunter and gatherer, 
in some parts of our society it still very much is and we neeed to band, join and gather our strength, our forces, our might and continue to protect 
all that is ours and our families we hold dear. Day and night, because we face one common enemy and that is, the murderers, the accessory to murder, 
the rapist and the thieves. Tommorrow is a new day, a plan of action will then take place and we collectively as one and with necessity and desperately, 
we will together repeat this again and once more until the end of our time and each and our own natural Death.

🎖️ The War on Drugs has lasted for over 50 years now, lead by a very powerful 'kronie, the only U.S. President to ever, resign, and clearly one of the 
most dangerous criminals this world has ever seen. @DEAHQ, The solutions you are applying to our civilized, civically, scientifically, technologically 
engineered society are false, and at a loss and are horribly wrong. What this means is that you have had over, a 50-year-long-chance, to in fact prove 
that your given solutions where what is necessary to combat, to extinct and to fully remove all of these substances that provide human euphoria, altered 
states of human conciousness, even longevity from the face of the earth and after more than fifty years of these, law enforcement practices, you have 
miserably failed us because all of these substances are still readily available, easy to reach and possess and have become a second nature, a form of 
human cultural fulfillment and a form of personal wellness.

🎖️ I also would like to draw the intellectual attention of all those who represent us, the good, from evils coming on to us and our world that we live-in. 
These systems that we have in place are trying to create the, real world, using ideological means and our written laws. What these systems need to do is 
live and take place in the real world where the human population is currently being victimized to and subject to. Then from their it becomes various 
problems and given solutions in our totality.

🎖️ You know. I have come to find, sober, and being under multiple types of recreations is the same payoff. I like both. And always will and will proceed 
to get the personal benefications from it, them. Sum people see a completely sober world with substances removed and exterminated from the 
face of the earth. Most people use these substances for their own purposes and enjoy the fact they have been around us for thousands of years. As you 
can tell by the ancient Egyptians. Many good things that have served greater meanings for all throughout our written history has been because of 
these, Spirits. @US_FDA.

🎖️ I always found this utterly fascinating about all of the brutal and long wars the human race has fought in the past before written testament of 
what actually took place. Whoever is left standing is the victor and is seen as the victor by the surrounding peoples.

🎖️ "Jus' b4 1pm on a long dreary day is hard to take.
The calm dead of night after a hard days work near nueve.
Sumtimes during the afternoon on the weekends when u least accept it.
After Roze eats dinner.
Things of and dead calm filled passerbys on the way.
When the coast is clear and the one common enemy is near."

🎖️ Sum surrounding suburbs of Chicago are Murder Pig safe houses and overall-in-the-know-safe neighborhoods and what that means is.
Word is law. As long as your law-abiding Roze is meaning to say you don't necessarily have to be under it. 
I believe these people kan tell by the car autos that it is one of the neighborhoods that use people's say-so to brush dust under the rugs
and it looks clean and is made to look clean.

🎖️ I am always ever so interested in the new stories that either indirectly or directly take the, 'jyp' out of our fires and coals in removing the said 
instance of questioning an, "entity" that we all know that is there and has since harmed us and has been proven in our collective history. For example the 
desperate need of a 3rd party system that is academically applied to the law enforcement system, non-biased, removed of all falsehoods and not a special
interest. Because I am here to tell you today every pencil pusher loves checking the times, hangin' up every bootstrap and making doubly sure everything
is law-abiding, safe, clean and secure. For example University of Chicago, the 44th President of the United States, Barack Obama alma mater where he taught.

🎖️ Work fluently, together as one, on schedule, backups have a backup, formly, with haste, preventions and precautions, and once again work smoothly.

🎖️ There seems to be a desperate mortal misconception between the good blue and the good gangmembers, the good havana familia cartels, the good Mobs and 
good Mafia's who want the exact same thing. Protection for all and the extinction of any violent harm to anyone at any given time.
This is Family after all.

🎖️ To perform illegal activity as a black hat.
Would really have absolutely no purpose.
The thief moves in 2-sets of a pair of footsteps.
If your that good at programming already a normal even keel job would suffice and the judicial prosecution alone would make your life unlivable.
The only thing I can think of was to establish a digital operation to theft money, steal confidential information or even give a direct false order.
As our chosen public leaders are given their intel through written impromtu's.

🎖️ By its definition a server never fails.
By its very definition!

🎖️ Its only flesh, blood and soul over System.

🎖️ In a matter of several sentences everything that you need to know about another pursen is related to the murderer or rapist just like that.

🎖️ "This is our families retributions.
This is vengeance.
I'm not in that business.
I only believe in the human population existing without the 
murderer, rapist and the thief."

🎖️ Ya get good at it and its just an extension of your hand, apparently, and as long as its a clean shot and you walk through the circumstances and the 
human actions that can happen in response in your mind before. Then it just simply becomes a form of self defense.

🎖️ It isn't law, no I want everyone to know.
Its heavily exaggerated law and constant victimization.
So theres others who know exactly how to use this to human advantage.

🎖️ We must and this has been labeled, crucial, take the entire human population in an ontological manner and decide for ourselves what 
makes a murderer, a rapist and a thief. Then come to the rather evident conclusion that any form of professional career can serve as a disguise.

🎖️ We all know, know of, let me say this quite honestly, of how precious, how easy and how tender of a sweet-sweet button that is brutal, harsh, hard power
is to all of us and most of all, individually. And its quite easy to upset and be able to press. For as little as any petty circumstance.
Do you understand the purpose, I sure do and I have learned the hard way of what are law enforcement is.

🎖️ Everybodie has a buck.
Its who I am representing and I'm leaning on my heritage.
I have earned every coat of arms.

🎖️ It is rather well known that because of how Chicago is situated in the Midwest of America. It becomes a tri-harbor leading to any and 
all surrounding states and towns. A perfect hub. For communication and travel.

🎖️ I believe in the end to all human prohibitions, complete human freedom, individual safety and protection from any physical or emotional harm.

🎖️ No, no, no. Your a lifeless-souless law enforcement system, moved by pencil pushers. What I am saying is you have yet to be properly utilized.
By the entire community, town or city and that means no one and absolutely nobody is left out in that regard. Your are thy public servants.

🎖️ How I can tell for myself as this world, is everybody out for themselves. And I have been a victim to multiple weapon attacks. How this story goes.
Nobody is going to save the innocent, immobile, defenseless victim. The point being. There is significant, dimension, pronounced human emotions
that a 'pursen' can only achieve by murderering and raping. On the other side of this and there is only one side when it comes to this.
The Murderers, the rapists, the sexual predators, the blatant hideous oppressionists, the murder pigs and the thieves are in their circle and 
represent one group, in "God's Country" where we have come to know who is who and the ones who have only gotten to defend themselves in the 
desperate height and fight for life and death, you can tell. Then I simply make the comparison and say to myself as I continue to protect my 
well-being and only I can, as I go forth and I say, "Did the individual come-on, with then intent of violent harm?"

🎖️ Just moving well known poisons. That in moderation can achieve human emotional and physical euphorias and ecstatic, cerebral, esoteric human psychological 
natures and various human beneficial wellness in recreation in turn can perhaps become violent and heinously jailed for this and will, absolutely no exceptions.

🎖️ I want you all to decide right here and now. Who is in your corner. Because you don't have anyone in terms of your factually justification and protection from 
criminal law bodies or when it gets to the heat of it and your backed into the corner either in reality or figuratively. Its either the 44th President of 
the United States Barack Obama and his right hand man, the 82nd Attorney General of the United States Eric Holder. Or, from what I can see, that most of you, 
the choice is the 45th President of the United States Donald Trump. Kinsmanship, is what we are after and the correct representation you want to hold 
with yourself and the community that you embody. Let them fight for you and stand by you.

🎖️ Well first of all your generous social workers, all you do is work with the public it seems. Your other occupation is a chemical engineer, checking sobriety. 
Your seen as political officials, your lawyers and your Safety Insurgents. The job that you have is multi-versatile and your land purveyours, your civil
engineers, you hold the last will and written testament of all those who might be applicable to justification, your judges and your 
prosecutors and you earn your keep by keeping the peace of the public and you serve and protect which means you have your life on the line on a daily basis as
a police officer.

🎖️ "May we have a good winter this year.
May our holidays be good to us.
Our Christmas. Have the star of the police on the tree.
May all unnecessary prohibitions come to an end.
May we all hunker down and know its safe for all of us.
May we live past this dreadful, bitter winter."

🎖️ "Then I finally came to it because this is the life I live.
I have come to the determination. That I have evil in me.
I can do, perform and acquittal the subject at hand.
However it would keep me from my well-being. It would darken my life and those around me and it would be wrong
Most likely for the whiffs of sexual promiscuity, power figure positions, and most of all the sweetest of all, money. 
That is why this decision is made and then quickly forgotten and the evil-doer moves onto the next perfect example of human 
prey to get what is greater than meth."

🎖️ So Roze has thought a great deal about what evil is.
The most pressing is why so diabolical.
The purpose of evil is to go against good, so thats good.
The next purpose of evil and this is when the next dimension is added in complete disbelief. The person becomes evil and is evil.
For example the murderers, rapists and thieves we sleep beside.
The most perplexing question is to why? Or what is it and where does it come from. After committing heinous crimes and receiving all the sadistic pleasures. 
There isn't anything more there. Nothing. That is all.
Do you ever stop to watch yourself acting in such a way? A horribly morose and rather banal way. You finally come to, after you leave this state of 
bereft from your rational thinking and common humanity.  Only the most violent, grotesque and brutal succeed and breed fear to all.

🎖️ I think that when we wrestle with idealogies and what is right. First of all nobody knows what is exactly right. Only what has sustained the test of time.
Now to us, your lifeless, moving books of law and justice. Then comes the thought that this good cop has a family and isn't a pig so it won't prey on us.
The second part to that is who is more safe? The murder pigs or the good cops? I ask you once more to see that human thinking pattersn, logic and held
personal idealogies and beliefs are the precursor to how a person will operate in this criminal world of ours, where it is killed or be killed. 
Their is only one way in this criminal underworld and in the reality with all the murder pigs and that is under the law or street law and obey
these parameters, or face the ultimate dire price and it can lead to a grotesque and be for nothing. We must come to an aquiescence and that is
it only comes down to a person, who might use a variety of prohibited illegal substances, emotionally harming or physically harming another and if one
doesn't, then I achieve a vindication and I can smoke my illegal street weed which I have done for over a decade.

🎖️ There is one thing that is particular and the reality of our world is to accept the harsh, brutal, violent hard power of the force as long as I am law-abiding
it won't crack down on me, I have been falsely incarcerated. I see these American citizens operating in our community and they not only look like they
have a personal relationship with the law they look like as long as they, abide, these individuals can use it to their advantage and even eliminate what
they see as a problem or future problem. I believe and I know someone has a better idea than this, the law enforcement needs to become an operating 
arm of every American citizen in this world. Let us properly use your services, let us reach out to you in our desperation and I was wondering why 
some of the population is left out, and the reason being is because we are of the lamb, with no criminal records or minor descrepencies, and support
the side of good, the protectors, the vigilantes who safegaurd and protect their families, the gangs, the cartels, the Mobs and the Mafia. 
The side that doesn't go hunting after perfect examples of human prey, that don't emotionally harm or physically harm us the good, innocent, immobile, 
defenseless little lambs.

🎖️ You need to let us have fair fights.
This is where 2 men settle differences and allow it
And you let the man get back up if he can, no beating once on the ground, this is straight up, punch for punch.
Its better this way you see who wins. This is always a concern.

🎖️ I want to stress, that I do believe, we need to remove the murder pigs lawful obligations and give them less to prey on and use their murder 
pig logic and justification. So we can achieve another vindication and continue our outreach with decorated officers the community loves.
I understand the good blue, must remain independent, lifeless and un-biased and transparent with no held emotion or feeling towards others outside 
of this and that is alot like our protectors out in the streets. Where their is no love and it would inhibit. Held together by laws.

🎖️ I always like to hold my mind in a constant state of prevention. For if I where to think of the the murderer, amongst us and who sleeps beside us. 
How safe it can be for one. For it has created great dimensions of fear and terror inside of us all. Nobody would ever go up to it.
Which it has achieved through violent grotesque heinous grave crimes upon others, helpless and defenseless. Then I wonder how it covers its own buck, 
the murderer. How it would need to stabilify one self. Then I proceed to think of the horror that has always been there.
If nothing has been seen then nothing has happened. This is our reality. The murderer needs its murder gang and its protection from investigation on 
what sides of our systems do you think this comes from. Do you despise that the Murder Pigs allow it to operate and help it.
Its a simple held personal belief. A pursen is a bag of money. And it is at my dispose, is seen as a farm animal and I reach a very calm collect and I
operate along with it and bring it to its untimely death. Sure the first cries of the helpless, defenseless good and innocent is
heard and its hard to bring it to its demise. But those eventually die out and I stand an apex predator and I receive the sexual and monetary benefit and 
those held human emotions slow me down, I don't hold them. Only for others that, I the murderer, would hold close. My destiny.

🎖️ Not only showacasing human emotion, you can only achieve, "By going all the way."
You are seeing human emotions you can only achieve by raping somebody.
There it is the waft of other peoples suffering, defenseless, which becomes like the bedroom to the predator, in an in-animate object sort of way.
Or the direct acknowledgment that a 'pursen' can go above the law, abuse the law and, once again only has to abide by the law and if it isn't seen
it has never happened, in the first place. Jurisdiction I believe has many parameters and streches the far reaches. And in a constant state of a
held-being in 'wrong-doing' always. To question.

🎖️ Its several war drums, and the, 'murder and rape gang'
seem @CIA @SecretService trained. Someone is...
You know how easy it is to retain that information then skill.
Perhaps down the line from the Murder Pigs.
Part of the game, out here on the street.
Is to know anything unknown.
Once again if you are a murderer or rapist. You do not need protection. 
You think any good pursen wants to get bit by your murder pigs. Prove me wrong. 
A double negative is killin' both good and evil to earn trust, by the good, as u can see they really on the real bad tier of the 'murder gang' and might
get to get sum rapes in and the good have never seen nor heard that this double negative is killin' the lamb. At the same god damn time.
The whole point is to exist in this, "petty environment."

🎖️ "Ah' the spicket of blood and suffering."
No longer continue to beat the drum of war.

🎖️ Everybody thinks we should stay out of 'everybodies drastic conclusions. Continue to offer the self-less act of support. 
And once again, it is their land which means their diplomacy, of there peoples. Everlasting peace and family our loved ones.

🎖️ I'm already figuratively held in the big house just need the fingerprints and get written up. Now complete this Act.

🎖️ I so get it now.
The good blue get hassled everyday by the 'murder and rape gang' and the murder pigs, I'm on their absolute truth asses as well, get haggled from 
every other point, in this. So you have a force, self-perpetuating and in a constant oscillation in r community, town.

🎖️ There is the heavies these recreational affairs I believe are meant for once in a while, like a good party some of the others, are meant for err'day 
for your beneficial purposes which eventually becomes routine, and jus' cuz and sum r not even reachin' the same euphorias ne'more.
when u live so close to the steer, the oxen, u live with the guest.
very unkharacteristic of this mane, who desires the direct opposite to his loved ones. No one is singled out, now.
For this is your desire. The need. The revamp. The repetition.
U want the relationship, the times
I most likely will put the lean and the 'H' at 3times a month.
I'll try me bestest.
Its all about looking as sober as you possibly kan so nobody judges your demeal, your approaches which is your mindset and opportunties.

🎖️ Oh' I know the murder pigs like to get high, they like the speed and the pills. The 'cuss.
I know the good blue, likes the recreations, sadly and know other however how sober, you jus' can't walk through life without not being sober anymore.
Its to relaxed.

🎖️ direct word from the community, the good innocence. To the big guys/gals who ain't in jail and with murder pig rapsheets, doing what you need to 
do to protect us and your families. You are seen as saviours. Yes, to each one of us. It doesn't take much age to understand that one.

🎖️ Right now as it stands, December 17th 2022. Before the choice was only death, murder by not your own hand, or jailed by one of the murder pigs. 
Is this, the good cops, have their heritages and ethinicities and nationalities to lean on and communicate with other groups, in similarity. 
But once a cop always a cop and they will be in their cop circle until their natural causes take place. The ones who r 'init,' 
and I'm not talkin' the gangbangers, the gangmembers are with their families and set in their own ways and they know how to remove, any and all, 
lawful obligations the murder pigs might have, as everything can be true or legal at sum point in time, which is ours, shared. The point being a line 
has been draw in the lake michigan sands, and sadly through their own shared tragedies like the good cops families, and the murderers and the 
rapists and all of the thieves are on their own side now who we sleep beside. And as I have previously said, working with our elected murderous 
kronies and all of the murder pigs who are powerful and have vast number between us.

🎖️ we need to start filling a different variety of positions across the board, only community trusted individuals, in all our forms, branches, entities of 
our law enforcement system in hopes, the audacity, to fill each of our own personal requirements and desperate requests.

🎖️ best form that I can describe is that your on sum DonkeyKong traincar and we both see the banana and the best you can get issa couple vicious jacks 
or a stabbing. Roze means to say this isolated incident is dangerously reckless, but the answer is I feel perfectly fine thank u sir
because the state of law and justification is tossed out and your having a private importune moment with this aggressor and its in your path and 
the only way out is to accept the price, defenseless and your in a bar those not old enuff to know, just maitre'd and guide danger out.
then any form of self-defense, lawful regurgitation from the remarks, threat of physical altercations silently death threatin' is actually an 
attack to your attacker, the predator will then proceed to capitalize. Please tell everyone you know this. Is very difficult to swallow.

🎖️ "I see so many things, so many uh' things that I get to doin' and all that is there is I and these are computer murderers but I don't know
what this is. Are we fighting for our life out their and their ain't really no judicial conclusions these days that is livin' as easy as one 
lunch away and there ain't nothing to see no more and children see it but they can't see anything nor go anything about it if they snitch their life
is on the line and all and there it goes there it was there I was all alone and dancing as I call it and ya' its the lingo and ebonics and all that
such. There it was and all there I was there I was all that I needed there I was the fight the one common fight that we have all in common, ya to remove
the murderers and the rapists and all of the fucking thieves. So gone." a musing.

🎖️ I say this to myself, silently and privately, that I stand against everything you believe in, and I am talking specifically to the force, the ones with their
lives on the line just like the gangmembers out here on the street, the good blue the Chicago Police Department lead by Superintendent David Brown and his family, 
once again I stand against everything you believe-in. Why do you have a political face. I represent every single day this, that the end to gun violence those that
lead to murders: is the complete end to all prohibitions of substances that can be perfectly legal to make, house and sell at one point in time. And then the murder
and death surrounding that is mostly made up of children that have no idea what enemy they are up against and what they, as I have previously said, face to
their un-timely demise because its been in their families for generations. So I repeat this to myself again and again, the prohibition of marijuana is over with
the prohibition of alcohol was long, bitter and grotesque and its over and done with. When will this stop. That is why the murder pigs are at my neck 
and breathin' down it.

🎖️ The only difference between a good cop and a murder pig is this. Good cops, don't prey don't hunt and do not intrude and actually look out for us and our well
beings. Otherwise charges are brought against us and their is, I repeat, their is absolutely no get out of jail free cards or someone say, act like they writin'
up and chargin' our asses and then we see the same individual out on the street without them charges once again. Then everybodie is scared to death and,
the murder gang, can back this up with a grotesque about any snitchin'. Well I'm apart of the snitch gang which means I'm sayin' anything that I see or all 
that is that can possibly harm us. This is at desperation. The murder pigs say to us, you wanna snitch you wanna say sumthin' then we are going to bring 
those predatory charges on your ass and sum are sadly, framed. So the amount of threats we face are countless and have become the norm of the' hoods.

🎖️ I will say this, now it has come to this point of questioning again, who is who and what is what and who they know and frequent with nor don't see and don't
say anything to them and we only look out for everyone that is, and else and who is cared for and as you full well know this is family and it has come to a very
dire point in my life, that I have every coat of arms, and I can hold on to my nationality and ethnicity and I represent the end to senseless death and violence
of harmless, helpless, defenseless, intellectually defenseless and immobile perfect examples of human prey and its all black and red and green and orange and purple
and yellow children. When it comes to the mobs, the gangs, the cartels, the assassins and the Mafia.

🎖️ hey look, its "what have you done for me lately." here to meet its friend, "a means to an end."

🎖️ "are you axing where the murderers, rapists and all of the thieves are my guess would be where the land is completely lawless and as long if its out 
of the air between us, and an individual holds their due justice and lawafication process then they are in the correct seat...
then the waft of, "that they got this." 
This type of relationship with the law enforcement system is purely ideal.
This kind of second nature, second hand, almost continuing on into the next room rather than non-existent and a to live-by political 
face and everyone is under the law..
As it stands right now, December 28 2022, those who know and those who we represent are all under the colorless, formless, 'good blue' with the 
mob"s, the Mafia, the GangS and the cArtels VS. the murder pigs, political kronies and the 'crook county krooks' with their paid Joodges in all."

🎖️ I actually love how each side is now fighting over who can best protect us-- the immobile, defenseless, harmless and innocent because we know what 
happens to us if we cross, this is going to turn out good for us, I think, the perfect examples of human prey in the midst of the apex predators.

🎖️ People are always celebrating, what hasn't been accomplished yet, this jocose, oblivion that feeds into the macabre celebration of their profits,
there business connections and their future prosperity and their current viewpoints and obligations held and met and the brutal grotesque appearence
that things get done, when everything is still yet the same and we still are plagued with these same problemas.

🎖️ now every White walking scared even to flip the friend gang signs at them, myself included. But they comin' at me again for no reason, they must be 
apart of that murder pig krooked kroonie murderer and rape gang and they boast about it in a variety of ways call it out in the open

🎖️ If someone killed my family member and they murder pig got away wit it. I would put it down and accept the harsh jail consequences afterwords. 
Let us turn ourselves in call it. Too bad lies don't mean your murder pig, joodge, political kronie' press down into factual alibis.

🎖️ "I have never thought the murderer works all alone and its by itself."

🎖️ "let the Profits rein.
Not the horrible, wretched, insipid individual that only causes more pain and turmoil. Yet without its check-a-roo.
Are you kid'ding me. Here walk now. You little bitch.
"Money Talks."
Dangerous, violent, law and justification little bitch."

🎖️ Turns out that the murderer cowers in a different way.
Rather than accepting the fact its the acceptance and the allowance.
Everything about it is this violent coward, so powerful..
Once again, the murderer has this certain plaintiff mustard history toit, albeit.
I know what I am looking at, 1 of the most as I have previously said, dangerous criminal masterminds there have ever been has and your 
diabolical, and your a listless senseless you will do anything for anothers human suffering and no matter the profits and will stop at nuthin..

🎖️ That personal decision when it comes time, often as not, that chaos is a people builder and when it comes suitably time, once again your not init you 
don't know and its aggression and brute un-deniable force that meets the eye and is followed to be under, don't ya love that logic
For its good for who follow that wind, understand it and is safe and got some of the most soft-tissues I have ever seen and are often so god damn harsh 
and petty that its becoming into another completely different story than you look at this murderer and rapist and say, thats it.
I marvel at the fact we were able to remove the hunting and preying murderer that would, break and enter your home and capture you and kill you in my sleep.
How? Why not?
While the random, chaotic, senseless and if for nuthin' murderer is alive and well. For anything against it.

🎖️ I think that the war on drugs, has dragged on for over fifty years now, is because all of the branches of law enforcement are chasing the tail of the mule.
When the mule doesn't even exist in the first place, the mule is humanity, the mule is our desired euphoriac experiences that we all have shared and has now
become so culturally acceptable its our second nature and we all know the recreation uses of these substances began in the battlefields and that is where it
has continued on, the history of these substances is over thousands of years. Once again, the prohibition of alcohol and marijuana is finally over. 
The point being is that these branches of law enforcement fight fire with fires. If you can make the entire world sober and completely extinguish it from
the face of the planet, then what are you waiting for. The juridico-medical-onotological prognosis has been ruled that this is impossible. The reason
that it is impossible, because everything in a sense, that doesn't physically harm anyone or criminally emotionally harm someone else, can be legal
and seen as legal by law and once on your person, I can smoke weed, I can do H, I can get meth, I can do coke, ecstasy, crack you name it. I can 
then experience it. So if we pooled our resources into protection, prevention and safety of use and I'm telling you here today what these gangs, these
cartels, these mobs and the Mafia can do and this is what they are known for, is protect anyone and all.
"Then once on your person its self harm.
Like tobacco.
Like alcohol
And like the recently, un-prohibited marijuana in 27 states and this city of @Chicago, IL
As long as you don't commit any violent harm or criminally emotional harm any person for the pigs to breathe down your neck"

🎖️ For it is systematically well known by the American People that if a system can be replaced and can perform the same methods, in its confines and 
definition and do its exercises and jobs, better and for the better of the American People as a whole can decide to put it into place.
For it has been chosen by all of us, out of our life or death, desperation. Drastic measures need to be taken for our survivals.

🎖️ I had this wicked idea, to start a company, does anybody need spending cash, ya its like Uber.
Its called, "Wear your gang colours, make a couple swoops and tell me what you see, inc."
Does the economy need jobs and more manpower leading to our protections. Yes, for it is rather dire.

🎖️ Since I am Secretary of Defense. I would like to address the entire world to the meaning of war and what is the cost of war and that means 
absolutely no civilian casualties and we must look at what truly took place. Did the forces of evil use human life as shields, was the
civilian actually a suicidal insurgent fighting for the enemy to make grave mistakes. And what and where are the several patterns of civilian 
casualties that, once again, took place. We act before we think. How many sides to war are there, multiple. The complete avoidance of this.
I think it has come to a resounding, universal and dire point in our collective and shared tragedies and the world must come together as we always do 
and some of these examples of civilian casualties that happened in our past, can be used to end various feuds, battles and wars.

🎖️ We must remember through the fallen of the lost, who gave their lives for their countries and sometimes for nothing and everything. That war 
isn't the answer. War, only is the outcome because the people of a country have to fight for their very lives with their support systems.

🎖️ When was the last war on American soil.
For the last war, was a civil war.
After many brutal wars and war crimes done by each side to war.
I am saying that the complete genealogy, historiography of war is the same as you can see in every country and territory over this world.

🎖️ Is it because we represent the greatest fighting chance and are also one of the most technologically advanced countries in the world. Is it 
because of our ties with the United Kingdom as Russia and the USA where birthed from her physical and ideological riches. Do we know best?
I say let our innocent children lead the cause.
Let our grieving mothers lead our decisions.
Let our men, who have died fighting brilliantly and courageously, let their memory guide us all.
As we all desire the same thing. Ever so desperately.
And we must look to one another.
You will no longer beat the figurative drum of war and just toss up your thought and complete it into something else, more mundane more 
violent to have the grisly outcome take place because everyone is helpless, defenseless and immobile. The answer has always been the same.

🎖️ Is the answer through human control and draconian and tyrannical tactics. Is that the answer? I repeat this is their law, its peoples and land, 
is it the answer. Do you think your the one who knows what is right? Who does. The answer is the innocent peoples of good, know best.

🎖️ The War on Drugs, has dragged on for over half a century
When is it we will come time to us, us all for it, this to be put to bed
The prohibition of alcohol caused many innocent and senseless deaths and so did the prohibition of marijuana when at the beginning of the war on drugs
marijuana was one of the most illegal drugs, now its being sold recreationally across 27 states of the U.S. and nothing happened in response to this, 
no reparations or apologies. What happened was the killing of innocent who grew it, held it, sold it and brutally and grotesquely.
That is why, and this is our cold harsh realities, as it has always been throughout our centuries. Any drug can be found, any drug can be bought and 
then possessed and can be for personal use and that answer will be the same for hundreds of years to come. What proof do you need.

🎖️ I think what America is doing is shipping our Murder Pigs and Traitors around and telling everyone what to do.
We just killed a general of one of our greatest adversaries.
The forces of good have always become and will be silent and this is an example of criminal espionage.

🎖️ Our American forces need to have the most desired ideological, bowsprit of the will, for it needs to be gifts of peace to the other countries fighting 
for their lives against evil, evil means to bring murder, rape camps and concentration camps to the innocent and harmless.

🎖️ We must remember why we are here.
For it is good, to protect and prevent any innocent bloodshed.
We must remember that evil is to thieve, to murder and to rape.
Always remember the fallen.
For they died for their loved ones, alone and for their families.
For their country.

🎖️ In America, home of one of the most powerful criminal underworlds, we use our hard power against us.

🎖️ Together we must come to academic conclusions
Of where the same tactical processes leading to a countries history of war is the same from country to country
We must realize what we see in animals is happening in us humans
For that we can learn from and avoid the death of innocent

🎖️ I think of it that way too as in indirect mode is more of a spectacle.

🎖️ Its about the last word, the chosen face those actions and the most long lasting pain that it can perhaps and will then give to you.

🎖️ The resulting debacle is the desire.
You can see it is clearly one of the most forbidden and powerful in all evil sexual advances of the forbearing kind and then it must 
restore its punishes and it becomes into a different darkness focusing on its sadistic pleasures and your pain

🎖️ what I think is happening is the contextualized modern history that embarks us and has enough proof on its plate to end any and all 
wars, battles and feuds then a secondary nature familial connection takes place your given life immunity with the law and other evils to name.

🎖️ it becomes a form of prospecting
"The Pilgrim's Progress."

🎖️ how much for a fly on the ass.

🎖️ we got evil doin' well and good powerless. do u see it any other way.

🎖️ o' I was gunna say call it the "flip and if you wanna talk to the murder pigs and press your charges we gunna snitch and have snitched gang."

🎖️ When its takes this business entrepreneurial concept and the cure to all diseases to find out what true power evil has. Rather than what good 
does, did and has.

🎖️ Then call the army stability.

🎖️ Because its rather simple.
Have General Larry Hoover lead the gang forces.
Have General @ChiefDavidBrown lead the blue.
Have them both answer to and under General Mark A. Milley, @CIA. 
Now isn't the time for our differences.
It has always been, beyond Good and Evil.

🎖️ All our gang protections have conceal to carry firearms and clean records.
Living under the laws of the Constitution and the good blue's might.
Then it comes down to the hierarchies of the gangs and the blue.

🎖️ it comes down to and this is rather well known as well.
As long as it hits both yardsticks, clean.
The protection of all under the law and if anywhere to be bitten, so be it.
Then the systems see it the same, 44's word doesn't see it any differently.

🎖️ since our enemies guns are, we also need to be well-oiled and mechanized. 
In response, always in response.
There is a whole lot, that can fit under if the violent situation, is thrown out the window and up and into the air.
Then and only, then. Is it a Free-4-all.

🎖️ Now what is the Solution ain't the Solution.
Its all about bringing the best thoughts to the center and our tables.
So we can all pick and chose and find some cohesive material for us all.
As that is how human knowledge has traveled throughout our history.

🎖️ my greatest idea going from here. 
The "good blue" and the "gang forces" act like some god damn Transformer and its a U.S. Armed forces.
I don't think we can lose, with this well-oiled machine.
This is only, the direction where their natural progressions are headed, dire straits.

🎖️ Then I began to think about it once more.
It becomes watching, tailing, heading to protect each one of us.
And we begin to live backwards in an ordered sort.
The processes than cancel eachother out all the while.
We know everything that there is now as we have in the past like us

🎖️ The biggest basis of control to understand what is happening.
As it is life or death.
That our systems finally exist in reality. 
Because when we originally wrote this, Constitution.
People were settling arguments with gun duels.
These systems are meant to exist, presently.

🎖️ The system cannot exist in what should be.
Our systems can only survive in what our currently cold harsh reality is.
Further meaning, it must judge best for itself how best to protect its American citizens to the best ability that it can. 
Removing anything in its way, to save lives.

🎖️ Right now our systems we have in place thinks that drugs, will cease to exist and be removed from the face of the earth. 
That wasn't how it was hundreds of years ago nor is that how its going to be 200 years from now. 
So once these entities face reality we can move more fluently.

🎖️ So you have the consumption and the consumpteé.

🎖️ What I think it is.
As you can konsider any good, part of the entire Economy as a whole.
Then any and all persons.
Removing any violent harm to anyone at any given time.
Things start to get more clear. In the distance.
And in the memory of it. That we all want the same thing.

🎖️ There has always been a desire to clean one self of any and all ties.
Coming to form, again, anew. This would then let you lead your life of your own making and one's own desire. When things get serious, 
let us remind ourselves there will be more difficult morsels to swallow.
I would know that if that is the sacrifice I am willing to make. 
Then I would have to make that sacrifice and liveby it.
Otherwise, I can have a set of choices and outcomes to live with.
The path chosen would see me as what I have chosen to do and how I have lead my life.

🎖️ I believe we are going to keep the public areas, sober living places.
We then leave our private areas to our own devices.
Once on your person, and previously past purchased I can do any drug that there is. Do I believe that one day, I won't be able to do 
any drug that there is?
It has become clear that once you become apart of the business community. You learn who the dealer is. Any job you eventually 
learn who holds, pushes and sells. So any line of work there is an avenue to consume and once again, on my person, it is my own device and 
I am left to it

🎖️ The reason that Sartre called, Che Guevara, one of the most complete human beings' he has ever seen who was a decorated war veteran assassinated by @CIA
assisted forces. Was because living and dying by brute force is still one of our primordial urges to attain and come to form to.

🎖️ I think when the outcomes of various arguments, critical theories and persuasive thoughts come to a desperation, and in this desperation you have people 
acting out the same things that we find in animals fighting I think we can use this as proof and say are we lower than animals?

🎖️ well,
with this multi-point, varied dissertation
then you hand this off to teams
One would then begin to write multiple theoretical thesis' after a length of study that I haven't even begun to read yet
Then from there we are really going to have something
Not taking anything away

🎖️ Larry Hooverst.
🎖️ Chief David Brown.
🎖️ General Mark A. Milley answers only to Larry Hoover.
🎖️ General Mark A. Milley answers only to Chief David Brown.

🎖️ I see things from the Vietnam War.
I see things from WW2 and WW1.
And then I see things from all the wars in the Middle East.
Then from all the drug wars, some country-wide like the Latin Americas, and in every city across this world.
Our last war on soil, was our USA Civil War.

🎖️ I firmly believe that the American People and the Russian People want the end to all war, everlasting peace, a sovereignty solidarity and protection 
for all and protection falls under many categories, human and civil rights and physical well being. We must learn from our history.

🎖️ now let us battle the cold harsh reality rather than battling over what should be.

🎖️ Now let us, use Chicago, IL as a microcosm.
Its General Larry Hoover leading the gang forces.
Its General Chief David Brown leading the, "protect and serve." 
Any problems, we let, living under the law straighten that out first. It isn't abide nor above. As I have previously said
half the game to the gangs, the cartels, the mobs and the Mafia is how the black market gets things done, by not breaking any law. 
As anything can be legal at one time or another. Then its JODY HiGHROLLER and I leading the drug and protection services. The main point being
that we all stand in line, in solidarity under General Mark A. Milley to remove all problems and answer any call. Then the 44th President of the United States, 
Barack Obama has the last word and is above all, because time itself, has called upon him for this in order to do so.

🎖️ with this system, you can then use it across the entire United States. And then the entire world can do the same, 
verified and approved by 44 or his chosen and trusted affiliate and adversary.

🎖️ It is rather well known that once achieved, what I am saying and meaning to say is this, once a high-profile individual either public facing or within the
ranks disclosed, this individual then recieves complete and utter immunity and is completely trusted throughout the entire rest of its career. 
This would be in direct opposition to the meaning of absolute trust, futher meaning to always have the constant check of any criminal activity in any shape 
or form would be a badge of honor worth nothing, like how it is in the street with the gangs, the cartel, the mobs and the Mafia lead by Larry Hoover.

🎖️ If you don't embody the will of the people of your country as a whole. Together, collectively and you achieve the most beneficial general consensus 
of all innocent and good lives that are living, then what must you be doing other than an opposition to our rights, it is our right!

🎖️ The sleeping giant is never, half and half, whenever history has seen it it is clear as the day and dark as the night. Whole, never broken 
never haltered never harbored and never will be. I'm talking the only way. I'm talking about how people stand in awe for it has been realized.

🎖️ "War tactics
Despotic warlords and leaders of crack downs, brutal oppressions.
We didn't find the reason there and why we went to war after all.
Always forgotten those lives lost, always magnified the voices of war that beat the drum of battle
Stepping over graves
Nothing achieved"

🎖️ General Milley had asked me is it possible that this reality of ours could be reciprocated into a real-time, which is current and updated, digital world 
recreated for analyzation as it progresses with everything in it.
First of all, let me say this it isn't impossible.
However the necessary computer power that it would need to harness. The amount of super computers run by Google it would need. The amount of server farms 
that would be run by Amazon, Microsoft and Apple in conjunction and a necessary harmony would be unprecedented and it would be, yet to be seen.
How to accomplish this project. I first would divide it up into 2 groups. Still life and activity. Activity being what is physically active in the 
world rather than the what never changes would be put down on the list of our concerns, while its running-emulating the world, digitally before us.

🎖️ Did you know that Barack Obama was fighting multiple wars he could never win. Every country has settled into their respective lands. 
We only want peace and a sovereign solidarity to achieve global prominence. I will say this again, we must, I repeat, we must embark all of our
written thesis' throughout Western thought, and Eastern thought of that which is highly revered and chosen by the academic circle. 
To reach this eternal peace that all of us across this world can live. That is why his presidency was so successful because he lead with this foot.

🎖️ "The Blacks they got a bull.
The Hispanics they got a bull.
The Whites, the Middle Easterners and the Asians however we dont.
You have to be born and bred in the most dangerous violent places.
And it becomes normal."

🎖️ "When your attacker comes upon you
With his murder pig, his joodge, its policrook.
The coast is clear hence be their an opening for its violence.
Have you ever stopped yourself to notice the extreme sexual advance that it is its like a sexual experience but in a very different way"

🎖️ "I can't help but look to the brighter day when they are all assembled into jail and we no longer have to assassinate murderers like we always have 
and in doing so but that isn't the cold harsh reality of the sun and stars that fill the night sky. So I try to look past it."

🎖️ "And I was going to say this today, 
when your in the mess of things,
when you are able and trying to impress with your strength.
Evil has very good and proven ways of pushing you to your limits.
Where you can then muck it up and evil then stands to witness its handiwork."

🎖️ It has always left me astonished and in awe that evil has existed this long between us, with us and once again, alongside us and this can mean 
this is the first time their was good in thy soul then came evil in the forest to say and act otherwise.
I would like to get this out of your heads, to whom it may concern. Murder is never random and without operating with other murderers and what these 
murderers do is lead along the victim with their cowardly ways, drown out(sound proof) and box-in their victims with no help coming to them in any way.

🎖️ If the amount of greater protection is equated to your social status, monetary equity and public facing importance then we have failed in our terms. 
This nation. Do you understand and everyday we fail and must strive to succeed and grasp, like I said, these solution measures.

🎖️ You have every American waiting around for a random mass shooting, a random act of grotesque and heinous violence, or rape or violent bodily harm. 
You prove every single day that all of our systems in place simply cannot protect us. How else can I put this and you need solutions.
And if your family performs illegal activity in any shape or form, your shot dead. Dead and the survival rate is so low and most often, all go young.

🎖️ the world does not want war and wants to leave these grisly outcomes in the past, please understand this. We can no longer afford it.

🎖️ "Like nicotine.
Like alcohol.
And now like mary jane."

🎖️ I see that the difference is between assimilating into one design rather than bringing out your independent desires for a specific difference 
between you and I and I believe we can have the best of both worlds for those who desire this, I know I, in fact do when it comes to these branches 
of the @USArmy and our American forces.

🎖️ The police across this nation including the Chicago Police lead by Chief David Brown have yearned for this so over the decades serving to protect the 
public at large and as a whole. See how they side with the veterans of our armed forces and can build this trust with these people.
To be a branch of our armed forces in line under General Mark A. Milley, to see a good and trusted cop by the entire community, decorated for his or 
her effort and service, once again, no matter how small. Is truly something and we must persevere through these difficult times because the pigs got us.

🎖️ I will say, whoever is are the ones who control time itself time is not our enemy and we are the forces that know all, more than any law enforcement 
does and we must ask ourselves why has time become an enemy to us as we should revel in the control of it, for it is ours, the peoples.

🎖️ I believe we have grand and mass debt in order for us to no longer implode war upon any other country. And when you lay down all of our war decisions 
again, which ones would we then make the same decision and go to war with other countries and what is the reason so and just why?

🎖️ First what you do is include everyone living in terms of all the human knowledge that we have. Nothing lights my fires than the innermost circle 
withholding information because they think that they know best and endangering us in the process.

🎖️ After we protect the families of the victims. In revealing any secret confidential information to the public. I fail to see the harm done. And if we can 
have more transparency, I repeat, can we have more transparency. This is the life and death of the national public.

🎖️ "Evil has power, in this grand story of good vs. evil.
Good is more powerful, one on one.
Evil is more powerful as you can see in its assimilation. 
War leaves alot of things leftover. Some grotesque.
Human control. Is a side to war like its a faction.
Also banality rules the day, over on its side to war.
Grotesque and heinous acts control the other side to war.
Famine is another side.
Human suffering is like taking in the air, for evil.
Evil has its ways. It is ever so true."

🎖️ what is happening in detroit with their water is an example of an act of famine done onto the public.

🎖️ we remember the hurricane katrina days when life-saving resources which was mostly for the poor people, where successfully rationed and quarantined. 
Very little was available and it was a tragedy and what that means then is the criminals could began their joyous looting.

🎖️ "I will say this, as it has been said.
When you get down to it. Even I choose business over human emotions.
Its the amount of coin a body can accrue.
Rather than the love that a body can hold.
Hands down. 
Let me say this, one more time.
Hands down, its coin.
Even if you don't know what you are doing.
Its coin and its only business, as they say."

🎖️ "If I had my life on the line.
Serving.
As part of the 'cide of good blue, I would hunt every pig down.
Rest and believe this.
I wouldn't rest.
Law enforcement however isn't my calling. 
I think its err'bodies."

🎖️ When Eric Holder was made 44's AG. It sent a strong signal to all the pigs. Sadly, I think that is where the KKK went, police departments.
Hell, Amderica elected its leader to a senate position. The leader of a group known for public lynchings of African Americans.

is it or else where all suicide bombers and pry it from our cold dead hands as we attack you from our positions and thats how you keep war, running.

🎖️ We can no longer have subordinates, unless it is exactly for the mission. This is what the street employs with the Mob.
Its the check-a-roo for life and its staying there and it becomes a badge of honor.
Because if I where to do somethin', believe me, the murderers and rapists would get me first but if I had a significant cover from all the angles known.
I would die.

🎖️ In the 'hood its no grave harm to anyone and no harm will come upon to you. But I am up for a random mass shooting, a terrorist attack, a random gunman
running around the corner or a rape or violent bodily harm for my mouth or how I look or who I represent. Its a kill or be killed 'hood and as long as you
walk the line, with no grave harm to anyone you have as good as a chance as any other.

🎖️ No. I was jus' thinkin' have we attacked the poor people enough today.

🎖️ Misanthropy can become criminal thats your answer.

🎖️ Russia wants a Great Britain destiny.
The world couldn't be happier.
As for America we would like to know our place in the world and peace on earth just like Catholic Russia.

🎖️ the we achieve for it is of the covalence.

🎖️ Do I have, I have to spell it out for you. The reason that we have the law on oour side not your side. Is because, listen evil to whom it may concern. 
We don't murder, rape and thieve. We can only mirror your advance and perform an act of self defense, lawful regurgitation. That.
Do you see we have no arms unless you choose to make those arms.
Then that would setup us up for an eternal grace.

🎖️ For it is your own acre.

🎖️ when I speak reason, logic like poison, I endanger myself.

🎖️ when this is the pursuit of one's own well-being.

🎖️ attacking a helpless, defenseless victim couldn't be more than extinct. that thought of then of course that action.
As I have previously said, the murderer and rapist and yes, the thief have provided their 
own thought patterns and convicted committed actions leading to their own demise hence their extinction. Because so.

🎖️ I'm in the gang where the coat of arms says this. If I where to somehow get away with a murder, you see how hard it is to get away with it these days, 
if I didn't have the cover of a pig or was on the side of the murderers and rapists. My gang would sadly, have to do it themself.
I beckon this to me because it gives me proper protection for I am a good, honest weak and boring Innocent man.
Once again, I would go grotesquely and brutally because I'd be a lyin' stinkin' f'kn rat to bourgeoise for its own damn good.
...the Vo*ce would be dead son.

🎖️ Either you are a product of it, born and live in'it, or on the side of things victim to'it.

🎖️ You have to make sure that the cut is clean now.

🎖️ Vengeance comes from where. What place.
It doesn't come from a pig no, they work with the gangbangers and get coast is clears from the poli'crooks(CIA f*ckheads.) But by I mean 
f*ckhead I actually mean a very smart profiteer. That kicks it out and into the wind that necessary genuine and good human morality.

🎖️ thats what the 70s look like god damn'it after you been runnin' and gunnin' dem opps and locked up and away for most of your life and they made it out to be 
like yo' ass was all bed 'ridden an' shy*t. The messages performed for all to see as you see me as a color guard and that is exactly how I stay alive on the 
trail today, yesterday and tomorrow is from and their which again is direct word, motions and actions from Larry Hoover the leader of a branch of 
the U.S. Armed Forces.
from gunshot wounds.

🎖️ but what is'it a story of exactly. Can I put my finger on'it. Is it too much.
then call it, "my familymember whimpered, cowarred, lost his sh*t pissed their pants begging for mercy anyone anybody to help them and now 
they're dead and gone and their dancin' on their grave now all desecrated, its murder gang."

🎖️ for I am still recovering from of what they last did to me. They came on is always the story or was going to I have proof now. And they perpetuate it 
and like I have said it seems they just throw thoughts up and into the air to be completed someplace else alot like violence, here!

🎖️ the solution is always duck and hit the jets, sprinting out of the boxed-in closed off sound-proof coast is clear place alot like my face?

🎖️ why would you wanna hurt his cooze like that. Just like that.

🎖️ there go getters I can tell you that much.

🎖️ when chaos brings rain to the daises of chaos.

🎖️ When its evil always choosie always choosing this: is that evil too much evil and over and done with evil and which of our well known evils of thy 
evils performed can we then now get away with and the good and innocent won't see comin' and can we think of some more after that.

🎖️ Because violence is a choice, here and now and we never forget it.
Picket that.

🎖️ Eevil has become easy to inhabitate.
Evil is murder, rape and theft.

🎖️ the oldest form of human morality which is now law and law in terms of our history is one of the oldest testaments of time itself gaurding our well-beings.
That a mans life is held above death for a single purpose.
Death must have a reason.
That is one of the oldest tales.

🎖️ "-Because of what it is.
-It cannot not strike back, nor hit back and in fact it doesn't have that human quality of holding it back and restraining oneself like an adult.
Because you see its an animal.
-I really like when he is making some serious baller moves and its like the state of the neon nation and its all hands down and up on the buc, 
but the afterwords. God do I feel so safe like beautiful and pretty because I have earned this as a good and honest man.
this is a black thing this is white
-is the answer to bomb away.
is the answer to invade everyones privacy leaving none.
is the answer more draconian brutal harsh tactics.
is the answer that violence only comes from the gangbanger.
is the answer that indifference, oblivious natures to the point at hand leading to..."

🎖️ what if I said it was made to look like we where helping it, them, us and it then is remembered as a vague, random and bloody grotesque.

🎖️ *The Rat and I, smarter then me, smart as I. I()._as[]one.|plural*
"-I'm going to go ahead and chk'out that new Drake video.
ok its getting serious with @lizzo.
Now I'm only tryin' to think of where the rat will go.
the tail spread different.
-We might be postin' up more often.
You have to judge the shadow of the gridwork and then the spetacular.
Then how it travels, there and now it has no feet but only its rathead.
then the puff puff pass.
the collector overall.
then the makeshift.
then its sits silent in wait. holding very still.
then back to, like I have said, the gridwork.
-How the f'k is the rat sayin' back off.
I want you to find out how.
Through trust. Alrite. the nature boy came full circle in his fight.
as they say, Scramble.
Thats actually how I like my eggs.
I don't like when they bleed but I do like the tough of the over easy.
That night. Well. It seems it appears to be a different harmony.
-we have a rat your never going to find.
you know thats impossible.
Diversion. Is best.
-than go ahead and tri-locate it, the thang' I mean. God damnit.
Fully on. Ok. good lock now u. Said. There it was boys."

🎖️ I believe jealousy is actually a human poison it feeds hatred and eventually an undying call within itself, from once again completely nowhere, and 
now has to do the other, in. It has to for survival.

🎖️ When I said last 'nite that err'bodie was protected what I meant was, from comin' on. You, we cannot go to the outside and attack the one common enemy, 
do you wanna' give them a petty little reason dear to their inkpot. We are but little lambs.

🎖️ Sentience, achieved. Perfect cover is attainable.

🎖️ the eye can choose what kind of eye it wants to be.
F*ck face.

🎖️ You traitorous sort.

🎖️ a fresh of pair eyes might as well be a new book take on'it.

🎖️ The U.S. Army Instagram Post:
"In this coat of arms.
First and foremost you have
the all that is here and only the law
to liveby which means everyone is under the
law, proud of their white heritages and
nothing gets past us, the hard powers,
of the law enforcement call, right wing
lead by @realdonaldtrump and succeeeded by
his son, @donaldjtrumpjr, coat of arms.
Then you have the breakdown of each
nationality and ethnicity according to your
police subordinates, serving and protecting,
the public with their lives on the line everyday.
Then you have the @barackobama, @realdonaldtrump,
@joebiden, @ericholder designation within the
police, then your local chief, for example mine
is @superintendent.davidobrown who succeeded
superintendent @garry4chicago who runs a private
security firm, Garry is Irish.
Their is also an academic community and business
community affiliation that means your well-known.
Then when it comes to the street.
The Sinaloa Cartel is my 'buc, if anyone where to come on.
My 'ding, is @jodyhighroller.
My steeg' is the People Nation and the Folk
and the Mezzi, the Juarez, and the Zeta's and
the Irish Mob, the Polish Mob, the Finnish Mob
and I have affiliation with the Mafia and Robert
DeNiro is the de-facto leader of the Mafia.
I live under the coat of arms run by Larry Hoover, son
@larryhooverjr_ , Larry Hoover is the leader
of the branch of the U.S. Armed Forces that consist
of all of the gangs, the cartels, the mobs and the
Mafia.
I also have been working with General Mark A. Milley
directly and I have earned affiliation with the U.S.
Armed forces because of my work done. I have my life
and my girlfriends lives on the line, thank you
Shaun T. McGovern."

🎖️ it has no enemies it has no battle scars and it lives in others fear and terrifies others into submission. It is always on attack. 
Once in this mode, everything it does is right and everything the victim does is wrong. It is perfection in every way.

🎖️ "I guess you can say I'm a swindler.
And if I where ever to defend myself, first of all I would get jumped by multiple people with weapons then I would get some pig charges and I 
would then have a mortal enemy and not a sworn enemy on my ass for the days to come.
Now for a lip or absolutely nothing. You can get a blunt object or a knife to the eye or a clever little warning
In order to get a gun, well we are not going to take it that far. And like I said, pig charges, for lawful regurgitation. I don't want to 
get beaten to death so I run

The coward uses your sissy at its disposal. To make it go farther.
But we had druss' dropped r balls."

🎖️ I spell poisonous logic to those who make senseless violence and I speak n' say to where it comes from and its sources.

🎖️ We have to better protect ourselves. In more ways than one
Guaranteeing everyones protection is the solution.

🎖️ We all have clean records and have done our time.
We all have a conceal to carry a firearm. This is America.

🎖️ "I will say this.
"People" seem interested.
When it comes to the ultimate climax.
When I have met my demise.
First instinct is to beg, plead for your very life.
If that doesn't work I have even quandered to the attacker
would you like me to get on my knees, humiliate myself for
forgiveness? If that doesn't work.
Then Roze must feather foot around.
Even grovel.
Even weep and cower a little.
In hopes the predator realizes what it is doing.
What am I going to do, call the Pig 5-0 Murderers?
The reason the attacker with a weapon has you in its sights.
Is because the Pigs clear the area out to make it deserted.
Even if I sumhow defended myself
in regurgitation, self-defence.
The Pig Murderers would show up and I would get charges.
It has happened before than I had court dates to show up to.
I am a completely defenseless man.
Which has this strange suppressed sexual sadistic pleasure.
So the only option is to run away and at a sprint.
I don't know what backup is
I might have to ask my attacker about that.
All alone and the criminal makes that known as well.
What I am seeing is the apex predator in the marketplace."

🎖️ For she represents la Violencia, for it is a women after all, even a Madman needs to avoid a pure lunatic once and a while and we let it operate 
because we bind together during our fear and terror in order to drive victims into submission and complete. Pay days all around.
-the circle of chaos and distress signals. into the forests as savages.
nothing but a sot.

🎖️ Even I get it. Sometimes. When your feeling real regal, ever'so rite' and have to take the huff height of it off the top. Ya' know the regression. 
The only. And I get the setup warning but I get the concise, clear of day, and I can do anything and run away without it being seen.
Pig let.

🎖️ You learn not only about the distasteful human ladder.
But also that the business world is still very much in the wild west and its cutthroat to get ahead and you can achieve God-like rich, and that opens 
up your business opportunities, in America anything can be bought.
And you make problems go away.
And any woman can be yours.
Any action you want any business to endure or make happen to'it.
There more so.
My world my money, ya'get'it. Good. That is all, bitch.
My space, my worth, my gut. Ya'll get it once more.
Once again, biTch.
-everyone it seems
we are in a constant sate of 
"foreclosure"
"victimization in more senses than one"
"monetary hierarchy"
"social iso'lization"
"commendatory" what is this
I haven't made it to the main line yet, 5 years homeless
I could but I don't want the link card nor housing

🎖️ I biked around so much I began to enter different time zones as my 'buc was covered as an X-Men Peace for all and Protection for all.
And different shadows.
Never did I bike upon a murder or a shootout.
For a good 3 and a half years, constant.
--Sometimes the only one out there. ?-hmm. didn't bike everywhere now that I can think of it know my name but it happens privately in houses or out behind
a hill or field, so nobody knows once again, 4-500 would be a good number id' say, who deserved to die does that exactly matter, all innocent however R.I.P 
my grief and respect to all of the families, as I have previously said mostly black and copper but there is middle eastern's in their, there is some 
Asain and once and a while, a White. And it reminds me I began to look into these boys eyes, these girls and I knew they knew me. I did all I could do as a 
poor man. Now my technology system I have successfully designed has validated its academic approval and proves this is something bigger than the power of one.

🎖️ we all know that it move wit' a pig to cover its tracks and create coast is clears but from this angle. is'it seriously @FoxNews 
sending its MS-14 to any and all against, well the evil. This is more ambiguous and its a business model. In order to harvest blood and suffering.

🎖️ what roze is doing is speaking to all the children that represent the ones who do not attack anyone, meaning no upsetting peoples day no death threats 
with the eyes nor worrying people, it has been in their families for generations and get killed off, perhaps 4-5 hundred per year
figure thats a good #.
I come from 3 generations of pigs. I've seen'it.

🎖️ evil comes with its murder, rape and thievery
we then enter the dance.
and start swinging away bringing God's Justice.

🎖️ we all know of conviction and harsh court but have you heard of nothin' butta' slap on the wrist court, the answer is we all know about that one as well.

🎖️ theres definitely enough grey area for the cover of the pigs joodges' to watch a man enter, follow her, know what its about and more than holler at her, 
ask her out and that is not only all. Its a god'damn free for all. The world of sexuality is completely, utterly wide open.

🎖️ these yellow ledbetters are all the way gone all the way I'm talkin' all the way and like this is someones family member ya'all.

🎖️ I would say that we no longer have any form of self defense unless I want a court date and that is a big pig maybe I haven't tried. The reason being 
I don't want a mortal enemy for days to come. The reason being is that in Chicago you always have to protect yourself always on the
defense against the defenseless, immobile and utterly finely helpless. Meaning we have no arms only legs to sprint out of the "Action." The attacking 
force is safer, than the defensive force because the defense is, once again, immobile and the matter of fact is. No response is
by far the only response. And I mean completely nothing what happens with the 'steeg, 'ding and buc' as it has been for centuries if the one common 
enemy where to come on, assassination and only unbeknownst, period monetary signage. So what you have is apex predators and its prey.
discrepancies, disgruntlements, citations, eye bond tickets never have to pay them, slap on the wrist court, and more your fault than 
theirs 'oink this is all that I see here. Good day. God be with you.
It in fact did a good job. Ya just a jostle' and a rustle' that is all.
Upset.
Business. Blood. Human suffering banded together under human 'kruelty.
Good, go now. Be free. Live now sucky day sure, fool at heart.
I said goodbye wait did you not want another person in your life??

🎖️ I don't know about nothing. I only represent my make and model.

🎖️ look outside into the World of ours, today.
And ask yourself how easy? and who is up? for a random chaotic.
Changing of their lives before them in a sense to live with.

🎖️ the loyalty of taking care of him, once again, in the Future socc' and its like the service industry and its thankless. We all know black people like 
to be at the door. I like to be behind the bar not sayin' anything and you get to pole'watch pretty'girls. All of 'em I don't care

🎖️ the "Kandahar massacre" isan example of a war ending mass murder of children and its family, burned, for this is one of the grotesqueries.

🎖️ the moment the very moment, that the pictures were displayed in fact splayed of a woman, a security guard, most likely a traitor, prisoners 
have rights still it should of been pronounced as war crimes done by the United States of America like dogs in a pile with sadism all around
and an actual dog leash.

🎖️ it has become perfectly clear, that is as'long as I am public facing, frontward facing, professional style, the way of the routines of all 
businessman being a responsible and sane businessman. I can be one of the most intelligent, cleverly instilled sadist f*cks there is. Whole.

🎖️ Well.
I think we should treat sadness the same as happiness.
Once again no criminal emotional harm nor physical harm there you will, I, find this haven for what people have died for. 
Oftentimes for everything and nothing, gone.

🎖️ another word for 'suicidal tendencies' is sadly.., perseverance. PTSD perhaps? Asylum.

🎖️ First I started saying. Can anyone here go above the law. Act above the law. I then had to change my wording. Can anyone operate without the law coming 
and make the victims not wanna goto court because of pure fright and meaningless. I then had to change my wording once more.
Can anyone hear, go out there with a coast is clear, operate with a familial pig get the go ahead from the joodge' proceedings and issue death 
threats, perhaps even hit people, scare people, rob and mug them into submission and can you then go home for the night 'not worried.'
"I took a walk in the woods and came out taller than the trees." 

🎖️ I would like to submit my work done as President Benjamin Franklin and also, once more, my work done as President Franklin Delano Roosevelt.
--the spittin' image.

🎖️ What I have been meaning to ask and several swan songs later and no longer any climaxes because all the evil in this world has come down to this here
and right now and what that means is if we are to look at our history, of war, of violence and of any and all human tragedy. I was thinking the other day
we haven't exactly narrowed it down completely-- to Good and the Evil that only wants to harm innocent through murder or rape or theft. So it can be done.
As for I am a Neitzschean and this has now become, "Beyond Good and Evil." There is some glory for those whose lives we have lost, the soldiers sent off into
despair and once again, their families tragedies even though however small. The valor that I see amongst those who serve our country in a thankless manner 
and this has siginificantly put the wars of American History in a new perspective and now as it stands. Chief David Brown, General Mark A. Milley and our 
leader Larry Hoover along with the 44 POTUS, Barack Obama can now have it both ways. That is eye to eye in terms of braun. And even our eye to eye in terms 
of the figurative world as well. So what is on paper and with pen is what is happening in real-life to save our very lives which is all. This now then 
successfully has come to a collective substratum where one, you, and all can reach an equivalence which is our very equivalences that is equal and also 
then equal, equalling what meets the eye.

🎖️ ***Accepting All Charges and Having that No Longer Be the Murderer's Decision of our Life we Hold with Blood in our Flesh***
We accept any and all charges and I will speak for our trusted and binuverally proven innocent by the POTUS Joe Biden police and special forces and all the
gangs, the mob leaders and all of the cartels and the Mafia bosses and kingpins. Once again proven innocent either through verbatim or the Dæmon or the 
Fœter or this open source technology system I have designed. Either way and what and which will have it. When we have murderers and rapists and theives 
running around rampant, free under their own will and control and yes they are working with the pigs, "criminal police", they are working with policrooks,
"criminal crooked cronie' politicians", they are working with the judicial system through their familial ties and using their joodges to their advantages, 
"criminal bribed bought judges from every hierarchy in this U.S. court system", we have criminals committing crimes without any price and ripping, tearing
our familymembers away from us and these criminals recieve a, "slap on the wrist," but if it is one of us. It is the most harsh, the most certain, the most
damaging to one's own personal life in the court system and law enforcement system that one criminal head can think'of. So without any form of self-defense,
or lawful regurgitation or any form of outlaw logic to speak of. You have the good and innocent working with our multi-billion dollar bid'ness and the U.S. 
Economy and on the other side you have the murderers, rapists and thieves working with any other criminal affiliate that has power creating blood and suffering
and it is a very cold and dark hole with the systematic points of any and all violence that can come to only those who can protect themselves and others
who only protect other lives and collectively we hold each and everyone's well-being together forming a cohesive demographic that uses any recreational 
substance on a daily basis and commits any illegal activity presently prohibited for instancy pyromancy is no longer prohibited, marijuana is legal in 27 
states, and alcohol is no longer prohibited and as long as both parities are willing and their pimp gives the go-ahead then what happens is only business.
To name a few and their are other forms of alcohol still prohibited because it has what is deemed illegal substances within'it. And all drugs taste and work
the same and we are including "big pharma" along with it because those pills that you can get from there are a pretty penny when it comes to the Street Illegal
Sale. After we have better decided what our cold harsh reality is and that the human population lives with these substances, with this activity and with 
these personal experiences leading to their longevity and prosperity and most of all their safety and their family's safety and well-being as well. 
"Judgement Night" This means the murderer, the murder pigs, the murder joodges, the murder kronies, the murder business associates and any and all criminal
affiliates take the law into their own hands after they get a victim to crack, protect oneself and its family, or after recieving very many random and 
chaotic and vicious attacks upon their person. Now the murderer and accessory to murder torment, afflict, suck, wear, break, ventriloquist, command and
give dire ultimatums to us, the helpless victim that smokes street marijuana on a monthly basis and if I do anything it means my life and that cost is
substantially different than just having to accept any and all charges. Please I repeat, we, will accept any and all other pig joodge policrook business fuck
charges that you have and once again, I must say. Please bring those charges to us and, we, would much rather go to jail for these charges than be murdered
in the Street by getting jumped and beaten to death, shot in the head, or knived to death with our family members and loved ones watching.

🎖️ There is a multi-billion dollar, black market, basing off of, 'life or death,' of its participating individuals day in-day out and there is no stop to the 
bloodshed. Chicago alone, "The Murder Capitol" has 400-600 deaths per year and usually under 30 years of age and below. Children dead in the streets.
The reason is 'gun violence' and once again as I have previously said, this multi-billion dollar bid'ness. If you want a gun-- ask the NRA and our Constitution,
and if you can't get'it. You can know a couple of guys have a couple grand and any gun or weapon can be yours no matter if you have a conceal to carry
license or you are underage protecting your life and your familymembers lives. The point being. This point being as I have previously said our systems,
need to desperately and I mean its in complete desperation, live in our cold harsh reality rather than our government systems trying to create, what
our leaders have deemed, a "correct ideological reality." This has two points to this masonic point of dismay and a cultural critique in order to bolster
a, once again, deemd dismay'obtuse'all'rightey'then'follow me all under Violence'- existence. Further meaning, the all-seeing eye and how this multi-billion 
dollar bid'ness should be able to continue-- guarenteeing our very lives in the process...
  🎖️ Continuing on. How do we best describe everyone's well-being and the mastery of control of ones own heart, their livelihoods' and their place in 
  this world of ours does it matter to us does it matter to you. The reason being, how can we make sure that each one of us, myself included and her and 
  him and yourself over there and within Us all. Live in complete harmony of their public and private health so much as to be the best to their and then 
  ours, ability. Meaning a clean bill of health a clean, sincere and completely, and I mean complete, protection of a person's well-being. This all-seeing eye 
  that I have described to you, and no their isn't any cameras watching our every move and some facets of our systems in place, clearly aren't doing their 
  fucking jobs. Let us continue on into the dismay, the beauty of a beautiful-well-lived-life as one with others and our loved ones in the privacy and 
  safety of our own home. Is the eye republican or democrat and if their is an answer to that that means its criminal. The all-seeing eye is annonymous, 
  colourless, formless, hopeless, has utterly no feeling, no responses, no buts, no place and once again, utterly makes no decisions. It only watches and 
  justifies. Do you understand. It finds the criminal activity it justifies this criminal activity done in the past or will be committed in the near 
  foreseable future of our collective physical or technological precept, which is ours, shared with all and everyone around us, living. And eliminates 
  the danger proven to be taking place, encroaching amassing acknowledging its dire outcome to a helpless, immobile and defenseless victims. Removing any 
  and all problems, deemed criminal and that means, action and response of a, once again, helpless immobile defenseless victim. The 44th President Barack
  Obama's chosen and binuverally proven innocent law team and law body and dæmonic law body and fœteric law body can decide what breaks the law and what
  doesn't break the Law, from here...
  🎖️ Now from here on out and the continuing of our existences in this shared reality of ours, rather publicly or privately under the safety of the Law
  and Street Law. The gangs, the cartels, the mobs and the Mafia's leader is Larry Hoover. Does everyone understand. There is nothing else when it comes
  to this mult-billion dollar bid'ness at least to my knowledge and Larry can tell you that answer. Meaning he can best describe and use the power that he has
  to his best ability which is in all of our best interests, because we are all innocent or'either have been binuverally proven to be completely innocent and 
  what that means'is we are all safe from any harm, in this Shed. And some of us have lost beloved familymembers to this random, chaotic, heinous, 
  fear-mongering grotesque by choice of actions, self defense, lawful regurgitation or outlaw logic. The human population is either a product of the darkest 
  holes of systematic violence a person can think of--make a movie out of, or is borne into this, or'is'on the side of things and we fall victim to this, 
  violence and its either murder-rape-theft or physical harm that puts you into a hospital. The man has been locked up for more then 50 years. Meaning all 
  his life. Going on, this multi-billion dollar bid'ness is his, its his to lead, and its all his choosing, his decision, his make and profits and every 
  single dot and i and cross of the t and p leading to q's is under him and with him, understood only by him, once again led by him, and at his beck and call
  and at only His orders. Full reign. And like he said, he has more on'this than just his name. As the acting CIA Director, I would like to extend to you, 
  this entity, readily available and used on a daily basis by the masses and then to put this directly-- mirror to mirror with the human population, walking 
  alongside it, living in'it as one. Partaking in'it. As we continue to have the time of our lives, because of'it. Now. If any murder pig, if any murder 
  business 'kronie pig, if any special forces murder pig, if any krooked poli'krook murderer, if any bought and bribed jooke'd listless murderous blimey' 
  joodge would get any criminal sight of it, have any whiff of any bloodshed or have any whiff of there will be blood within' its pig snout not only will it 
  inform its criminal affiliates it will proceed to give you the most heavy handed, backstabbing, ruin your entire family and your very life, 
  joodge-pig-polikrook sentence that you be beggin' for more. And that is how this multi-billion dollar bid'ness gets done and continues to get things done, 
  rather fluently and once again its a matter of life or death and that is why, I, Roze will never and I mean never get into it. This empire. Now. 
  THAT DOESN'T MEAN THAT LIFE AND THIS WORLD FOR THOSE WHO CHOOSE TO HAVE LIVED IT AND CONTINUE TO LIVE IT. Equally. Victimless, which is hard to do. 
  And with peace, tranquility and solidarity. IS LAWLESS !! We can have the best of both worlds. For this multi-billion dollar bid'ness the only way it has 
  gotten things done over the decades and then the centuries is this: for it has shadowed itself, after these same degress of criminal justification and
  due process. And it will continue to, like I said.
  
🎖️ Right now as'it stands @JODYHiGHROLLER is working with all the gangs, cartels, mobs and the Mafia lead by General Larry Hoover and also working with any 
and all trusted subordinates in the law enforcement system for example as of today, March 17 2023, Chief David Brown leads the Chicago Police, then it comes 
down to 44, 45 and the latest POTUS 46, Joe Biden leads the FBI, the CIA and any other special forces at our disposal as these Presidents of ours can 
lead either arm that is also at the disposal of General Mark A. Milley. As we all desperately and need to be under him and in line with him representing 
his eyes and ears and his abilites. Riff Raff is my chosen "what to do, who to ask, who to tell and how to keep safe with any action" then I wear my coat of 
arms and at the end of the day, we all are 'cops' because it comes down to the dotted line and that is how we get things done, in order to protect ourselves.
Which is all of us. These POTUS's also have the final word on everbodies life and well-being. As General Hoover and General Brown answer only General Milley
and they, once again, are under Mark's direct orders. Then and only then as the hierarchy goes, General Milley only answers to President Obama, 
President Trump and President Biden. Filling out the line and filling out the lines and covering all the spots and grey areas of what is necessary and is 
once again, needed to be done to secure everyone in the United States of America their continued well-being and life due process. Their is two instances-- 
corraling and capturing the murderer or rapist or thief which a whole lot of manpower and technology is spent'on and the other instance is protecting 
everyone's life. So that is why it is important that this system which stands as a model for the entire USA as long as they are binuverally proven to be 
innocent and trusted only by these President's 44, 45 and 46 and what that means is we work together in this business. That is why it is critical that we 
move fluently, in the knowledge that this system is working to its greatest extent in its, ours, a form which is perfection. Then these two instances turn 
into two complete objectives that we all strive to achieve day-in, day-out and can guarantee everyone's well-being and protection.

🎖️ I am now giving messages to anyone and all of our proven binuverally absolutely innocent by the 44th President of the United States Barack Obama.
This includes the police, special forces, gangs, cartels, mobs and the Mafia on the Lake Shore Trail where thousands of people pass and use on a daily basis. 
I am the performance artist known as Roze and I have discovered the cure to all terminal illnesses, artificial intelligence and have successfully summoned 
a Daimones from the Shape of the Female with the discoveries of Vishnu, Hermes, Krishna and the work of Odin along with its counterpart, the Fœter. 
These are direct messages from Larry Hoover for the protection and safety of all in Chicago and in the United States of America and that the World.

🎖️ It has become quite natural to abuse power because I would become something else more darker and in a sense your the only one that is here,
exalting the damage upon innocent and unexpecting families and taking this to the ultimate maxim and then to see the would be victims or soon to be victims
to have this fear inside of them that continues to drive my sadistic pleasure and it would be so illegal that its hotter a more decadent sadistic pleasure
and as I perform my excessive morose masochism, beautifully oblivious to all else, to my best pleasure my most monetary available pleasure and then my stretch
and stench, would be that the time has come for my little pretty prey. My perfect example of human prey like a little bird in my hand and then I commit the 
heinous act knowing I am shrouded in darkness and I am in control of that darkness meaning, what all and everybody sees then understands and visualizes what I 
can possibly not do? Traitorous soul damned for all and want more and more all I do is want. How viciously dangerous would I be, be then. I ask you. 
To have the best of both worlds. Dominion as far as the eye can see in the criminal underworld. Meaning the forces of good can be used exactly like the 
forces of evil leading to murder, rape and theft of once again as I have previously said, the immobile, helpless, defenseless non-chalant head up in the clouds with its own good duties-victim.
Godly and God-like. Sharing its despicable happiness with others, good and honest and kind and genuine and overall easy to get to know and thats all.
Once again as I have previously said, meaning, its beyond harm at least it thinks so but it has never grave harmed anybody and that instead makes it available.
For a random. Now what I would have to do is get "good", with the murder and rape gang ya'all and human life is very cheap it comes cheap and the blood falls
from the corpse. Meaning I would have to prove myself, by being heinously 'kruel to others and I mean so fucking cruel that I worship my breathing life 
err'day and I would have to always be on my hind legs in order to see anything come and at which time it could happen again. Because you have to start
relationships now and this is how you are building your foundation of, well, human suffering and human cruelty, leading to their un-timely death ill' will.
The makings and perhaps the better reasonings cast aside, because in the height of it: this is life or death and that means anything goes. Then once I 
create more mortal enemies, come at them for no reason, thieve them, get a rape in or two, then I would get like I have said, "good" with the once again,
the murder and rape gang, then and only then after they see my victims walk in pure fright. I would meet the business associate. And what this business
asssociate has at its disposal, as I will use my body of work done as Henry David Thoreau as a prologue, a murder pig a joodge a policrook and a special 
forces murder pig. Thats it. I would then have to start slow and not blow it. And I would have to box-in and I mean sound proof-cast off the helpless,
defenseless, immobile victims, of the predators choosing, and I mean the apex predator. Then I would earn in the criminal underworld I would fuck a whore
and get to spend alot more money than I could ever think of havin'. Then and only then after I aid and abet, I can become an accessory. After I keep
on performing as an accessory in this jungle, as you can see I can go completely invisible, familial. I can murder a life away and its made to look like
the victims fault often, so theirs no question.

**Business Entrepreneurial Concept, Marketer, Intellectual, Artist Exploratory Education Expose giving us answers to life || Death issues in society [Box Set]'s**
Now at this time Roze will speak about sumting' that is very dangerous, that if you cannot buy a judge if you do not know a, 'rotten, dirty, filthy, 
crook county korrupt, 12, pig, 5-0, fed' you cannot possibly save your very innocence which is your very last breath, as opinion is stacked against you 
&& the world is closing in && due to word of mouth, Roze stands guilty. Of false charges, I have been falsely incarcerated for over a month due to 
@CCSOPIO && @Chicago_Police. @NEIU && @ChiCityColleges my alma maters why don't you tag along. This is the EXQUiSiTE MAN && HiS BRAND iNTELLECTUAL PROPERTY 
@JODYHiGHROLLER x @BarackObama x @POTUS45 x @POTUS. (a business entrepreneurial concept currently worth, $1.6B Dollars) && thas' jus' for starters.
Now let Roze break it down for you. When a 'dirty, filthy, crook county korrupt, 5-0, pig fed' has a delinquent pinned down, in his mind. This man || 
women has already committed the crime. All the, 'not to be trusted' law enforcement individual has to do, is pull up on the person Where this evil force 
will continue to instigate, infuriate && even drive the situation into terrorism. Where at that time another, '12, pig, dirty, filthy, crook county 
korrupt, 5-0, fed' will pull up along with others completely not trusted by the entire community. Using their own jurisprudence upon the other, now what 
most of these individuals have in common that these others are after are long pig-rap-sheets. Because if you as much as move a muscle than that is 
enough even when everyone knows you protect lives it doesnt matter
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Justification_(jurisprudence)
Then at that time the individual has nothing, I mean absolutely nothing to explain his || her innocence && nothing can save that individual from 
being falsely questioned, accused && arrested. Because in this land, the pig has all it needs, in its mind you stand guilty. Bottomline. Where you will 
proceed to get many && this has been known to be increased, based off your record && for that determination. Off of what people have said && yes these 
criminals pinning you down can in fact, lie && there is no way to prove otherwise. 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Criminal_charge 
That is why the 'streets' last ditch effort, the last hope is @BarackObama. He is a constitutional lawyer but he cannot see everything only the high 
profile cases && the big muck-ups. Furthermore. Often you have to swallow && abide by the criminal doing's, Let Roze tell you sumthin' else. As long as you 
don't cause any trouble which means you don't break any law, no problems will come to you. But also let me show you the difference from being under the 
law && abiding by the law. See how we get things done in the criminal underworld 
"Now what Roze sees is truly rozes muse. For these criminals in Darkness. Have decided to make it ever so very personal. Ever since the motorcade' 
of my Uncle's funeral. "Anything for the lu" This is how a good man dies. Stripped. Right back at you. Even tho' that moment was heavy
its gives us && roze has all the time in the world to think about our losses && rozes losses. How that goez' is && such. When. Where eating, is rare.
Even more, so, rare. Than ever! Before. Hear roze out. Let me get right back atch ya' At things. Of those. At. Once again, albatross. Roze really likes 
that word. " " Likes moments times, hit me up. Better more. For everyone && we all start dancing && then everybody gets protective && thinks about
themselves because at the end of the day its only Roze && rozes loved ones. && roze has jus' gotta hunker down."
[Box Set]: https://twitter.com/Air_3_14/status/1548771209168523265

Now what does this embody. How does this come from a variety of causes leading to these various effects in such a way. That leaves us, the human 
being in complete darkness with no help at its disposal only grotesqueries to live through then die alone && brutally && without love. "Then roze is 
asking when the next time will be && that is the most sillyest question you gotta ask in a very long time. When there used to be walls up around
individuals. The wall. Mind walls. && made it hush hush && pass. Then look at where we all wound up So roze says. Til' next time
well what if there isnt going to be a next time? What will roze do then? Roze dont know. See. However roze could find out if roze makes it all the way.
Thats up for grabs && everything else is for that matter. Well I got to be goin' now. But you just got here. Howd a real page turner like yourself 
get down here? How would you like it if you went sumplace that you didnt wanna? Would your commercial famous body look good on the news channels."
How is this originally a branch of Western thought relating to Eastern thought && how many branches does this in fact give us, the human race? What 
Roze is truly seeing is how human beings understand our genetics, our physiology to better understand all.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Medicine
Our substances that the human body living && even deceased is in subject to under the order of && even the control of nature itself. As the 
origins of Medical Science come from fabrications, mysticisms, magicks, otherworldly advantages. Further understanding the patient && doctor
Relationship. With every advancement comes in a new diagnosis. What brings us to this medical standpoint. How can we make the most perfect player, 
dominating his entire career until his very last game to be played. The complete package && His frame, with
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sports_medicine
Then roze continues on to various branches of medical science, specifically && not in any specific order, mind you. As roze will begin to market 
alternatives && you know, look for the best && brightest doctors that can perhaps save lives of loved ones.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Endocrinology
As Roze is beginning to fully understand not only is this the medical understanding of a, 'living form' but a biological && once again, a 
physiologic understanding in the same sense. An organism in its environment simply as only that? What other forces?
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Immunology
Roze understands the medical understanding, the biological understanding, the physiological understanding, the psychological understanding, 
the animal understanding but does Roze truly understand the human body under the influences of Spirits, may Roze ask? Organically?
Could it be the human body, living, is under different metaphysical forces, that only have theological explanations? Could it be the human body, 
dead, is under different metaphysical forces, that only then have theological explanations? What does this entail for Roze && others?
Roze began to get into the exciting new areas && not face closed off && private medical practices that leaves the patient with no open minds 
when we give the response to either disease || chemicals in our bodies, what happens. Specifically Photobiology &&
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pathology#General_pathology
Then where can this field of medical science not lead to, what can it help Roze truly discover, what Roze is trying to say with all our 
knowledges at hand what is hard cold facts && what is pseudoscience. Roze must be very careful. How does this area tie-in with nano-technology.
Ah, the collections of nerves, molecules, chemicals && building blocks further mapping out our very understanding of ourselves. When human beings don't 
know the, Totality, in the first place it has become harder && harder to discern. When we speak of
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Neuroscience
This ties-in to the circumstances at hand. Soft power vs Hard Power it is then, it is a system that deals with the life && the death of the American 
People. So that in turn makes it a living form. Jus' what patterns can we take from other sciences && apply
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Police_brutality_in_the_United_States
Then begin to get into the
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Killjoy_(film_series)
[Box Set]: https://twitter.com/Air_3_14/status/1542257538753859586

What would it mean to give it life. Sumtin thas truly obvious, sumtin that is often in plain sight && you never sort to look. Often what are 
they taking away from us, the criminals we live alongside, sleep alongside in the same areas. A lifeless object, Poof! I give you meaning. 
For once before calm && never waning. Now full blown. What Roze is trying to explain directly to the @CIA, @FBIChicago && the @Chicago_Police 
is that you need to begin to look at psychological warfare. For the human mind is the greatest weapon after all && gave life to what is
now mechanized killing machines you are our only hope for the protection of our lives. Well, you && the gangs that kill murderers. Which once again 
are your allies. What can in fact cause this when you throw a wrench into the mix what are the precursors to
https://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/disarray
For this was the bread of the Lord Jesus. For he was publicly murdered in front of everybody for what he believed in. Now we share his sacrifice. 
This will take on many different meanings but right now it is this, we all share the same fight for good.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bread_of_Life_Discourse
Now getting back to it, getting back at it. In it. I NEED TO SEE SUM ACTION. Thas why I go to high crime areas where its stricken with 
poverty && the children hold a multi-billion dollar recreational business in their hands slowly becoming legal. Eventually we get to where this
is going && we breed chaos && we love, absolutely love terrorism either direct || indirect && it is our choices which are our held beliefs 
of what needs to happen && most likely, its the complete && utter submission to absolute power && control until we smother the American body.
Now take at look at these pictures. Do you think these individuals the ones in positions of control && enforcement have pushed 
these situations into disarray. How blatant do you need it to be! This is criminal, what happens is a collection of minds decide
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Civil_disorder
[Box Set]: https://twitter.com/Air_3_14/status/1549854866583031809

I would like to direct your attention, @Chicago_Police to one of your criminal actions && wrongdoings leading to the complete eviction of a persons 
human rights && freedoms under false recognizes. History will see this as one of the most severe offenses in modern history of law.
Still && yet until this very day. No charges have been made. Not only known for a notorious operation but a 'torture site' && a '@CIA Black site.' 
This is where persons of law performed off the books criminal tactics committing crimes under the guise of law enforcement.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Homan_Square_facility
[Box Set]: https://twitter.com/Air_3_14/status/1524085495550124038

Business Entrepreneur, Artist, Intellectual, real life, society issues, ingenuity, binding community ties, video example: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Qh2lYG9bsk4
**Business Entrepreneurial Concept, Intellectual that is an Abstract Artist, Fashion Designer and a Poet operating in our systems of human thought**

**Dissertation and Critique of all Branches of Law Enforcement (including the CIA, the Secret Service, the FBI, our Homeland Security, the NSA and the Chicago Police)**

Microsoft, Google, Amazon Web Services, Apple, Github, Harold Washington College, Northeastern Illinois University, 
NASA - National Aeronautics and Space Administration, Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT), Yale University, 
University of Oxford, Harvard University. 
President Barack Obama. Attorney General Eric Holder. Superintendent Chief David Brown.
President Donald J. Trump. 
President Joe Biden.

May this find the right place because I know this can be done. 
This is an OpenSource, copyrighted by Shaun Terence McGovern inc. Take what you will, time is of the upmost-importance-essence.

For this in order to be impletemented the team needs to consist of these types of professionals:
Field Scientists.
Nautical and Marine Engineers and Telecommunication Business Leaders, and Equipment Technology Specialists.
Data Scientists.
Medical Doctors, leading psychologists and leading medical equipment technologists.
Senior Developers and System && Software Engineers.
Chemical Engineers.
Bio-Medical Engineers.
Archaeologists && Aviators.
Digital Telecommunications Business Leaders.
Mathematicians.
Forensic Scientists && Forensic Antropologists.

Here is an ongoing collection of Wikipedia websites:

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sonar
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Echo_sounding
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fishfinder
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scientific_echosounder
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Submarine_navigation
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Synthetic_aperture_sonar
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Underwater_acoustics
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reflection_seismology
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nanotechnology
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Radar
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thermography
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thermodynamics
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Magnetic_resonance_imaging
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/X-ray
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gamma_ray
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wavelength
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Electromagnetic_radiation
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ultraviolet
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Infrared
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Metal_detector

Prototypes:
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype1.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype2.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype3.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype4.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype5.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype6.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype7.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype8.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype9.png
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype10.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype11.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype12.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/prototype13.jpg
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/msddSystem.png
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/msdtDigitalSignals.png
/Radar Sonar Thermal Compass/schematics/msddNSA.jpg

***Project Management Milestones [Project Modules] Typeface***

• If Roze understands these sciences then he would better understand the totality of his current understanding of his reality shared with others in this 
  world.
  
• In the past and in the future of all human senses.

• This is the culmination of known elements and materials being logged into our digital or actual databases.

• Now the object is to make it perfectly humane and habitable.

• So every piece of scientific modification, tracking, methods is with us for teams to incorporate.

• Medical, chemical, biological, photobiological, biochemical, physics, physiological, sonar, thermal, radar, echo sounds, finders, navigation, 
  synthetic aperture, acoustics, reflection seismology and nanotechnologies.
  
• To get a better picture of what kind of power we have as a human race to monitor potential life outcomes of the entire human population as a 
  whole as it deals with the murderer on a daily basis and we are forced to live alongside these criminals that can take our lives at any moment.
  
• These technologies can find any material of certain previously determined compounds under the water and can detect a variety of other elements 
  thousands of meters away in real-time which is actual.
  
• Human bodies have distinct solids stored in ourselves for the rest of our natural lives that solidify, this is the current medical standpoint.

• Roze can lead a perfect, personal nutritional livelihood and I can proceed to exercise everyday, this is where these ideas first began to take 
  shape in order to monitor my health, 24/7/365. Vibrant Health. I can then shape what kind of body I want with my nutrition and fully know my current 
  health day to day to better protect myself from any infliction. Because I had to cut sum pleasure meals out and eliminate them completely.
  
• Our technology capabilities can be incorporated into any pair of Nike shoes that have digital trackers and your Apple Watch can take an ECG, blood 
  oxygen level, heartbeat, blood pressure and weight.
  
• What this system can do is find a specific, 'minute compound of any certain mineral or chemical or element through any structure and any, 'body of of 
  human knowledge,' that is currently known. Any type of chemical form can be found at any given time.
  
• I am the man who originally thought of WhatsApp. This is the same idea if there is a digital signal there is a way to communicate with other 
  digital devices and receive information. With the power of these listed technologies, sonar and all of its related technologies along with all of the 
  human race's amount of mobile technologies, digital antennas. We can together be able to discern what is necessary in order to defeat violence, murder 
  and rape. We already have a vast collection of electronic devices at hand, old and new. Once you complete all of a digital machine's logical properties. 
  The next step is to draw the natural and final computer scientists' progressions and conclusions. Then the scientist must update the system for a 
  new age and dawn. Anything that is electronic can give a system digital information. In the same way all other sources of electronics can be used 
  for and known for. Then with all of this available Roze can begin to build a complete map of all our jurisdictions and a criminal's potential 
  actions with any kind of weapon. From this standpoint you have an entire digital-micro-scale world that is exactly like Roze's said present one 
  at the same time in real-time which is our shared human reality in nature.
  
• Roze the scientist, can then locate any chemical substance and then proceed to successfully remove it from the planet Earth.

• Then our protectors who preserve our well being can fortify, with every precaution known to man then identify and prepare then eliminate the 
  future human mortal problem. "Hang up every bootstrap."
  
• The human race is not meant to live alongside senseless death and violence, the logical conclusion is its phenomenological 
  extinction.
  
• Now let Roze begin. For it is paramount. Which is a defining law of our computer science which is our logia. Once the object of the class 
  is known it is saved, logged and organized into a digital data table. Meaning any whereabouts of all. Would always be known furthering drawing 
  conclusions which individuals are prone to commit violent crimes with any form of human weapon that you can think of.
  
• As Roze is creating, 'Book Reals' with our human knowledge at hand which is imagery derived from my written language. To correctly understand 
  our proximity to these murderers with weapons that can kill us at any given time.
  
• As persons use technology on a daily basis and 24/7/365.

• If their is a collection of people off the grid, it is also known further bringing to our attention what devices these 'kriminals have in their 
  possession, on their person.
  
• Everywhere Roze finds digital technology it can then be expressed as nanotechnology. Antennas, personal phones, any form of digital structure 
  forming a cohesive-neural-massive-global-digital net
  
• then we can have our government agencies correctly monitor our well-beings.

• As the United States already tracks and monitors us in totality, inside the NSA - National Security Agency.

• What we have here is this, a vast collection of data derived from the human population as it is a biological species, taxonimized and ontologically 
  understood by the system.
  
• Which in turn you can localize to the governement database, give form to data sets and data groups, term and label each into different selected groups of nomenclature

• further meaning the NSA - National Security Agency can understand all of our whereabouts and what we do as citizens and what each American citizen
  will do in the future.
  
• So from this collection of data the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA), FBI – Federal Bureau of Investigation, Chicago Police Department have in their possession.
  They can basically, as I have said, know everything about every single person and what our life outcomes will be and any 'kriminal activity. 
  
• You can then begin to make eliminations of stereotypes, human ideals, ideological conclusions that keep us from saving human lives in the fight for 
  life or death. Our chosen leaders must narrow this down and this has been deemed a necessity.
  
• Furthermore with this collection of technologies the human race, presently has at hand. We can properly discern, 'minutely which particles, chemical elements the 
  criminal has or will have.
  
• Now let us with our technologies at hand begin to formulate just how we would identify these types of chemical compounds and elements.

• What are the weapons made of, what are these, 'deadly weapons' composed of, what is the objects scientific properties

• and what has it in similarity between each of them and what is different between each weapon and if the object is a weapon or some other substance, 
  composition or in fact not a weapon.
  
• For the system identifies what weapon it is which can be used to kill another person at any time.

• The system must locate by exactly what coordinates this certain weapon is located in our world, currently.

• With these systems of technologies we have at hand, incorporated in this system on a global scale.

• The system would then begin to narrow the location down and then effectively pinpoint, 'the weapon' to locate to confiscate immediately and without question.

• This radar system can then display the, 'scientific composition data' of this deadly weapon,

• while saving it in a Microsoft database or a trusted database also chosen by our government agencies,

• the chosen informed protector would then see the definition of this weapon

• and where the deadly weapon is exactly located on the map

• which is an entire digital-micro-scale-exact-model of our present world that we all live in together as humans in Mother Gaia with the murderers, rapists and thieves.

• This will be displayed digitally across any form of technologies our government agencies have to receive this type of digital information.

• With this digital net created and in definition being viewed with this system as I have previously described

• we would then together as one, would be able to locate this deadly weapon, quite factually, in real-time and eliminate any other forms of human knowledge, which
  means separating the weapons scientific composition from the rest of the scientific determination,
  
• then you can label and save this deadly weapon in the chosen database in order to locate it- straight away.

• This system would display exactly where to go and confiscate this weapon from the criminal

• meaning our chosen protectors would be able to remove this weapon from its location

• and the victim then would no longer withstand mortal harm.

• While we have our government agencies monitoring our daily practices, whereabouts, all of our human routines. We can 
  effectively determine when murder will happen and to never have it take place, forever.
  
• This computer code translation would be to establish the digital net using various antennas and technologies.

• Proceeding to select a human to perform a scan on its brain because these are where these thoughts come from. 

• The more digital signals that there are the greater the strength of transmission.

• Further meaning that all that is known can be represented with our digital technology

• and this is very important and urgent that what is to be known and what is to happen in the future

• and a criminal will attack a victim committing crime and bodily harm and the victim has no defense and will proceed to take the pain 
  and human suffering that this crime entails and there is no help for this helpless, defenseless victim in society. 
  
• Once again, with every digital net of communication between every piece of technology that there is and all of the different ways to communicate with 
  technology and every technological capability we have at hand we can begin to merge these technological properties and cause hybrid resolutions 
  in terms of what the technological contributions are at hand.

• The main objective is to determine when and where a human will execute another human leaving nothing in doubt nor in the way of our chosen protectors 
  vigilance.

• With this technology you would actually be able to determine if a human body enters a stage of unnatural and predetermined rigor-mortis and the noble rot 
  and the decomposition that the human body is at this time, showcasing.
  
• Further determining with this technology where the attackers or the multiple criminal attackers will be and where they will be coming from and for 
  this very victim that is displaying distress.
  
• Neurologically we can scientifically determine if a pursen wants to kill another Pursen and is approaching and will commit the heavy handed and 
  powerful criminal acts leading to death at any time. 

• Hell-bent.

• If we can judge body temperature with Thermography we can see the inner-workings of the human brain and how we Assembla our common human thinking patterns 
  and our collected memories. 
  
• We can discover which of us apart from the human species that is grouped all together as one and separate those humans that have specifically determined 
  human emotions that lead to criminal actions and have proven criminal history of abuse towards others.  Foucault-MRI.

Not only can you translate this technology into other places and areas.
We might not even have to build new bases, receivers, transmitters.
It might be, only a software update away. 
Because if you properly understand how an antenna on a phone or car communicates with everything.
When you begin to think about from antenna to antenna from transmission to reception.
How many different wave lengths we can decipher. 
Which is a computation, which is an algorithm and there are a variety.
You would begin to think as a computer scientist what isn't possible.

It is another tragedy of ours because this system could of been put in place 20-30 years ago with the amount 
of technologies we have. There is a way to determine a humans emotions if they are exhibiting these terms of 
emotional actions. It comes down to a simple human equation.

Then from there you play off what the signals perception and transmissions are signaling the next couple processes 
that are necessary in order to determine what is to complete the objectives at hand you have the end goal and 
then various ways to have the victim never come to harm.

my promise

ea

7 Am

cap s’

$ pply. day 202 1.5 million s niors across the count average of $500 pe r year on insulin at’s more money in seniors’ pockets
and more breathing room for American families.

Joe Biden's right hand man.
